https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/asia_pacific/north-korea-seeks-help-from-republican-analysts-whats-up-with-trump/2017/09/26/ea91909e-a278-11e7-8c37-e1d99ad6aa22_story.html
	North Korea taps GOP analysts to better understand Trump and his messages 

	BERN, Switzerland — North Korean government officials have been quietly trying to arrange talks with Republican-linked analysts in Washington, in an apparent attempt to make sense of President Trump and his confusing messages to Kim Jong Un’s regime.

	The outreach began before the current eruption of threats between the two leaders but probably will become more urgent as Trump and Kim have descended into name-calling that, many analysts worry, sharply increases the chances of potentially catastrophic misunderstandings. 

	“Their number-one concern is Trump. They can’t figure him out,” said one person with direct knowledge of North Korea’s approach of experts on Asia with Republican connections.

	...But to get a better understanding of American intentions, in the absence of official diplomatic talks with the U.S. government, North Korea’s mission to the United Nations invited Bruce Klingner, a former CIA analyst who is now the Heritage Foundation’s top expert on North Korea, to visit Pyongyang for meetings.


If you look, you can find a lot of people trying to shape the perception of the conflict surrounding North Korea's missile program and the intentions of the parties involved in a way that pushes the conflict closer to disaster (see [here]((https://web.archive.org/web/20170929042710/https://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/70ni31/mcmaster_we_have_to_move_with_great_deal_of/dn4s63d/)), and I think Bruce Kilinger is one of them.

Despite Congress' reluctance to point them out, it's hardly a secret by now that there are many people in positions of influence--journalists, pundits, subject-matter experts and even elected officials--who exploit their influence to mislead the public. Identifying, cataloging, and deducing the motives of these agents of influence is exhausting but instructive. If someone were to take up this task, they might find, as I have, a consistent pattern. Whether it's fake news sites in the U.S. and China blaming the other's government for unleashing a computer virus, Pundits in China and Japan claiming respective ownership of islands in the South China Sea, "experts" raising fears of all the ways Saddam Hussein might have weapons of mass destruction and terrorist ties, former officers of the Tsarist secret police printing anti-semitic literature in a German basement, Kuomintang partisans blaming the murder of a promising Chinese official on a president who fancies himself emperor, J.P. Morgan-owned newspapers urging their readers to murder socialists, or socialists urging their comrades to "further the revolution" by any means necessary, the effect is the same: these agents, witting or otherwise, have used their influence to create the conditions for war.

Of all the groups and interests charged with using their power to manipulate public opinion, which have employed their influence toward such destructive ends? The *Tanaka Memorial* would have believe a part of it was Japanese imperialists, the "Westmoreland Field Manual" claims another part was the CIA, the *Protocols of the Elders of Zion* tells us to blame a secretive cabal of Zionists, and Lenin, asking "[Who stands to gain?](https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1913/apr/11.htm
)," pins the blame on greedy capitalists scheming to profit off arms-dealing.

Lenin might have been brutal, but he was no dummy. When such a disparate range of people--from Chinese bloggers peddling fake news to American weapons experts with Ph.Ds--all mislead the public with the same phony narrative with no apparent gain for themselves, the question of *who* is ostensibly delivering these messages doesn't always tell us much, and we are left to ask *who stands to gain* from the message?


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1913/apr/11.htm
	V. I. Lenin
	“Who Stands to Gain?”
	Pravda No. 84, April 11, 1913

	There is a Latin tag *cui prodest?* meaning “who stands to gain?” When it is not immediately apparent which political or social groups, forces or alignments advocate certain proposals, measures, etc., one should always ask: “Who stands to gain?”

	It is not important *who* directly advocates a particular policy, since under the present noble system of capitalism any money-bag can always “hire”, buy or enlist any number of lawyers, writers and even parliamentary deputies, professors, parsons and the like to defend any views. We live in an age of commerce, when the bourgeoisie have no scruples about trading in honour or conscience. There are also simpletons who out of stupidity or by force of habit defend views prevalent in certain bourgeois circles.

	Yes, indeed! In politics it is not so important who directly advocates particular views. What is important is *who stands to gain* from these views, proposals, measures. 


Lenin concludes it was the arms manufacturers who stood to gain most from the warmongering leading up to the First World War ("That’s where the millions and milliards squeezed out of the workers and peasants for armaments go. Dividends of 12.5 per cent mean that capital is *doubled* in 8 years."). The Krupp's and Creusot's of Europe, in Lenin's analysis, had more than enough capital to buy-off  writers, professors, and officials in such quantity that the whole world could be steered toward war. But there are some flaws in Lenin's argument. The war was an economic disaster, for one, and even if it is to be believed that greed for profit is the ultimate motivator of men, the overwhelming majority of capital then was not in the hands of unscrupulous arms dealers.

With the benefit of hindsight, we can take Lenin's line of analysis and do better. We can take a look at the events of that period of history that led to the war, as many historians have done, with an eye for who came out on top in the end:


http://www.pieria.co.uk/articles/interview_with_sean_mcmeekin
	**Historians have long argued about the causes of World War I. First it was Germany’s fault, then the Allies, then imperialism, then railroad timetables, then inflexible alliances, then Germany again. Most of us assume such a massive cataclysm required deep-rooted causes. Now it seems more historians are starting to see the origins of World War I as a series of miscalculations and accidents and think that war was in no way inevitable. Can you discuss the evolution of the historiography of the First World War?**

	Arguments about the origins of the First World War are as old as the war itself. Even as they were making the fateful decisions which sent Europe into the abyss, the leading statesmen of the belligerent powers had already begun “massaging” the record, with an eye on how posterity would judge them.

	...The early Cold War saw a surge in Marxist influence on the writing of history, with exciting new work done in social and economic history. Whether or not they were Marxists, historians of WWI felt the pull, looking into “structural factors” such as the arms race, the alliance system, imperialism and war aims, class interests and domestic factors. The most influential works of the era were Fritz Fischer’s Griff nach der Weltmacht (literally “Germany’s Grab for World Power”), published in 1961, and A. J. P. Taylor’s War by Timetable (1969). While Taylor did not go as far as Fischer in pointing to a premeditated German plan for war, he still faulted the Germans owing to the too-strict timetable of their mobilization (the famous “Schlieffen Plan”). 

	The convergence of opinion in this era was well illustrated in Barbara Tuchman’s bestselling popular history The Guns of August (1962). Curiously, most readers, even today, seem to think this book a chronological narrative of the origins of the war. In an editor’s note to the latest edition, Doug Grad tells us that the book chronicles “the month leading up to the war and the first month of the war.” And yet it does nothing of the kind. After sketching out the war plans of Germany, France, Britain and Russia (though not Austria-Hungary or Serbia), Tuchman skips through the assassination in Sarajevo and entire July crisis in one short paragraph, picking up her story only on August 1! Nothing could better illustrate the structuralist consensus of the era than this: a popular book on the origins of the war by a masterful storyteller which leaves out Austria-Hungary, Serbia, and all the diplomatic drama of July 1914.

	...It is only in the last decade or two that historians have rediscovered the actual events of 1914. There are two obvious reasons for this. The terrible wars in the former Yugoslavia reminded everyone of the importance of the Balkans. After 9/11, it was not so easy to dismiss the importance of the act of terrorism in Sarajevo which unleashed the furies of war in 1914. These lessons, along with the upcoming centennial, have brought forth a cornucopia of great new work on the subject. Albertini has been rediscovered; new evidence has emerged from the former Soviet Union, Eastern Europe, and the Balkans; and so historians now tell the story with much more nuance. The war may not have been an “accident,” but it was clearly contingent on various avoidable events, beginning with the assassination itself.


&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books?id=vQF099JYW_EC&pg=PA42&lpg=PA42
	ON SUNDAY, 28 JUNE 1914, the 525th anniversary of medieval Serbia's terrible defeat by the Turks on the fields of Kosovo Polje, a young Serbian peasant named Gavrilo Princip fired two shots into the bodies of Archduke Franz Ferdinand of Austria and his wife as they toured the Bosnian capital of Sarajevo, wounding both fatally. Because Ferdinand was heir to the Habsburg throne of Austria-Hungary and a man of controversial views in his own right, echoes from the "Sarajevo outrage," as it soon came to be known, reverberated quickly across European capitals. Accusations and counter-accusations flew between Belgrade grade and Vienna, spreading from there at second and third remove to Berlin, Petersburg, Paris, and London, as a growing mountain of rumors, half-truths, and obfuscations rapidly obscured the true nature of the crime. Lies about Sarajevo continued circulating for years afterward before the truth slowly emerged.

	By now, the basic outlines of the Sarajevo conspiracy are well known and little disputed. It is clear, to begin with, that Princip did not act alone. The assassin and his six accomplices (one of whom also tossed bombs at the archduke's motorcade) belonged to Young Bosnia, an offshoot of the Black Hand ("Union or Death"), a secret organization headed by Colonel Dragutin Dimitrijevic ("Apis"), Serbia's head of military intelligence. The Black Hand had trained Princip and his fellow conspirators; provided them with guns, ammunition, and explosives; and helped smuggle them and their equipment across the border into Bosnia.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT263&lpg=PT263
	The Russian Embassy was an important element in the context. Before and during the first Balkan war--in which the Black Hand played a conspicuous role, organizing guerilla bands behind the enemy lines--the Russians gave financial and political support to the organization


&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books?id=Litr5ENSmfUC&pg=PA138&lpg=PA138
	...Rachkovsky was not yet the capricious master but still the plaything of others, whose dangerous games would come close to destroying him. Hauled in for interrogation by the Third Section in the spring of 1879, over his association with a certain Semionovsky who was suspected of concealing the assassin Kravchinsky, Rachkovsky was obliged to declare his true allegiance once and for all. He would, he confirmed, render the police whatever services they asked of him; his order was gratefully accepted, and he was directed to infiltrate the People’s Will without delay.

	In only a few months, concurrent with Rachkovsky establishing himself in St Petersburg, the People’s Will organisation, or Narodnaya Volya, had come to dominate the radical landscape in Russia


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Okhrana
	Among the early Okhrana agents to work alongside revolutionaries was Lieutenant-Colonel Gregory Sudeykin of the St. Petersburg Special Section, who, in 1882, set up an illegal printing operation to publish the revolutionary People’s Will with Okhrana funds. Sudeykin and his colleague, a revolutionary-turned-police-informant named Sergey Degayev, passed drafts of the publication through Okhrana censors before printing. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=hU8lHfT4F5wC&pg=393
	It was, of course, another assassin, Gavrilo Princip who, a month earlier on 28 June, had precipitated the impending catastrophe by his shooting dead of Archduke Franz Ferdinand of Austro-Hungary and his wife in their car as they drove through Sarajevo. The bloodied cobblestones of the Balkan city were a long way, in every sense, from the Sussex countryside around Brighton, where Kropotkin now lived, or the middle-class English Utopia of Hampstead Garden Suburb, to which he sent his letters to Kravchinsky’s widow, Fanny; and yet they were linked: on the bookshelves of the assassin Princip and his co-conspirators in the Serbian underground movement, two works took pride of place – Memoirs of a Revolutionary and Underground Russia. From them, and from the practical example of the old People’s Will, the Serbian nationalist movement to which Princip belonged had drawn inspiration and courage for their bid to end Austro-Hungarian rule in the Balkans and promote a pan-Slavic agenda.


&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT263&lpg=PT263
	...For a long time, not only the Russian military attache but the Ambassador, Hartwig, were in intimate contact with Apis. There is no suggestion that he personally pocketed any Russian funds, but the Russians looked upon him as their particular friend, if not quite their agent, and quite naturally tried to build him up in influence.
 
	...Artamonov, the military attache, continued, however, to see his Serbian colleague and friend nearly every day. It was natural enough: they were conducting a joint secret-service operation across the nearby Austrian border, with the help of a chain of Serbian customs inspectors and frontier guards who had been recruited as secret operatives of Apis. Artamonov's contribution to the operation had been to furnish some $1600--an impressive sum by contemporary Balkan standards--toward financing the clandestine network that Apis was setting up on Austro-Hungarian soil, particularly in Bosnia.

	...According to former collaborators of Apis, Artamonov was fully informed about the subversive as well as the intelligence aspects of the project

	...Artamanov admitted his close co-operation with Apis, but denied that he had been consulted about the assassination. He declared that he had been away from Belgrade on leave in Switzerland and Italy for some time before the crime was perpetrated, and to back this up, showed the Italian sleuth-historian his diary for the months of June and July, 1914. It contained no mention of the tragedy at Sarajevo. For the fateful date of July 24, there was merely the laconic note, “Austrian ultimatum to Serbia,” followed, Albertini says, by the usual statement of Artamanov’s daily expenses: “coffee-2 lire.”


https://books.google.com/books?id=vQF099JYW_EC&pg=PA46&lpg=PA46
	...While any conclusions must necessarily remain cautious, there is more than enough evidence to reconstruct a basic narrative of Russian intentions during the July crisis.

	A good place to begin is with reactions to the events in Sarajevo. There has always been something suspicious about Russian denials of foreknowledge knowledge of the assassination plot. Russia's military attache in Belgrade, General Viktor Artamonov, was out of town on 28 June 1914, giving him a convenient alibi but a strange one, considering that the whole point of Archduke Ferdinand's ill-fated visit to Bosnia was to kick off Austrian military maneuvers in Herzegovina, which would have been of great interest to Russia's official military observer in Serbia.

	...Albertini, after extensive interviews of all the principals, concluded that "Artamonov was told of the plot, if not directly by Dimitrijevic then by some other informant." Unlike Artamonov, Nikolai Hartwig, Russia's notorious minister to Serbia, was in town on 28 June, and at least one historian, L. C. F. Turner, thinks it "impossible" that Hartwig, "the constant guide and mentor of the Serbian Government" throughout the Balkan Wars, "was not consulted ... and did not have detailed knowledge of what was afoot."

	Whatever the truth about prior Russian knowledge of the Sarajevo plot, the reaction of Russian officials at the time does not suggest that the news took them greatly by surprise


&nbsp;


https://www.quora.com/To-what-extent-was-Russia-more-responsible-for-the-outbreak-of-WW1
	Of course the real test of Russian approval for the assassination was to follow. Austria, first politely, then insistently, requested a Serbian investigation of the crime, which clearly originated within Serbia. When that failed, Austria, along with Germany, turned to Russia, with the just request that Russia use its influence to prevail upon Serbia to investigate the crime. Russia’s foreign minister, Sazanov, flatly, and with provocative rudeness, refused to do so.
 
	Serbia had an absolute duty under international law to investigate any crime which originated in its territory. By refusing to do so, Serbia was intentionally instigating a war with Austria Hungary, and Sazanov knew this. Why would the Tsar’s government tolerate this action from its vassal state, if it did not want the war, that the Serbian refusal would certainly provoke?


https://books.google.com/books?id=hU8lHfT4F5wC&pg=393
	As co-signatories to the anti-anarchist pact agreed in St Petersburg in 1904, Austro-Hungary expected Serbia to mount a comprehensive investigation of the conspiracy. Equally, it required the cooperation of Russia to pressure its fellow Slavs into compliance. The Serbs’ continued reluctance to concede fully to Vienna’s demands, even as the situation gusted towards a crisis, perhaps betrayed an uneasy conscience over covert official involvement with the conspirators, if not in the plot against the archduke itself. The Serbian police, after all, had enjoyed a good relationship with the Okhrana, learning from its methods. Nevertheless, the tension might have been defused, and the archduke’s murder have resulted in nothing more than an expulsion of diplomatic hot air, or at worst a minor regional confrontation, had not Austro-Hungary prepared to enforce its will by punitive military action, and the military alliance between France and Russia set in motion the engine of wider war. For as a member of the triple alliance with Germany and Italy, the mobilisation of Austro- Hungarian forces against Serbia triggered the terms of the binding agreement that required a response in kind by the governments in Paris and St Petersburg.

	As the man whose intrigues had helped secure the Franco-Prussian alliance and the St Petersburg Pact, Peter Rachkovsky must therefore bear his own small part of the blame for the outbreak of the First World War. Though dead, his influence lingered on as the Great Powers heaved their armies into readiness in the summer of 1914, and would continue to do so for many years to come.


http://www.pieria.co.uk/articles/interview_with_sean_mcmeekin
	...French strategy in July 1914 is a bit harder to discern than Russian. Once European war seemed likely, is easy to see why President Poincaré shared the Russian goal of manipulating Britain into supporting the Franco-Russians; but it is harder to understand why his line was so belligerent in the first place. Certainly France had no interests in the Balkans worth mentioning, and so in this sense Sarajevo was just as much "pretext" in Paris as in Vienna, Berlin, and St. Petersburg.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT287&lpg=PT287
	...A brief flashback to what had been happening behind the scenes in Vienna and in Belgrade, while the rest of Europe settled into its normal midsummer torpor, may be helpful at this point. From the moment the Kaiser had given his unconditional backing, the government of Austria-Hungary had virtually made up its mind to take some kind of military action against Serbia. The Emperor’s ministers and chief military advisers were not unanimous, however, as to its form. General Conrad wanted all-out war, with as little advance warning to the enemy as possible. Count Koloman Tisza, the influential Hungarian premier, a bushy-bearded, high-living, but exceptionally clear-thinking Magyar aristocrat, feared that this course would bring Russia in. Berchtold’s view, which ultimately prevailed, was a kind of sleazy compromise between two antithetical policies. As he told the German Ambassador on July 14, he proposed to send the Serbian government a note “so phrased that its acceptance will be practically impossible.” At the same time, the door would be left very slightly ajar to some solution short of full-scale war if the Serbian government showed last-minute evidence of reasonableness. In provoking Serbia, every effort would be made to minimize the provocation to Russia and France. For this reason the Austrian ultimatum to Belgrade would be held up until the French President had started home from his Russian visit; there would be no chance for a warlike brotherhood “being sworn at St. Petersburg over the champagne under the influence of Mrs. Poincaré, Izvolsky and the Grand Dukes.”

	A tragic accident in Belgrade may have heightened the dangers that were inherent from the first in Berchtold’s recklessly calculated risk. On July 10, Baron Vladimir von Giesl, the Austrian Minister in Belgrade who had been recalled to Vienna for consultation, returned to his post. At 9 o’clock that evening he received an unexpected call from his Russian opposite number, the redoubtable Nicolas Henrikovitch de Hartwig. The Russian Minister said that he had come to express his condolences “for the atrocious outrage” (Sarajevo), but there were undoubtedly other things that he wanted to say. What they were we shall never know. At 9:20 P.M., just as Giesl was launching into a soothing—and quite false—interpretation of Austria’s attitude toward Serbia, Hartwig suddenly slumped to the floor, unconscious. He was dead when a doctor examined him a few minutes later (he was overweight, and had suffered from angina pectoris for some years). An unpleasant scene ensued after the arrival of Hartwig’s daughter, Ludmilla. She brusquely repulsed the sympathy expressed by the Giesls, and poked about the room, sniffing at an eau de cologne bottle, and rummaging in some large Japanese vases. Her father had smoked only his own Russian cigarettes, but Ludmilla had wrapped up the two butts and put them in her bag. Had her father had anything to eat or drink? she asked with unveiled suspicion. In the tense atmosphere of the time, public rumor immediately made a poisoner of the unfortunate Giesl, who was even accused of having brought back from Vienna an electric chair which instantly killed anyone sitting in it.

	Hartwig had inside knowledge of the Serbian Black Hand and its methods (the Austrians were strangely uninformed on the subject, though the alert French Minister in Belgrade had already been able to ferret out for his government the Black Hand’s role in the Sarajevo assassinations).


http://www.pieria.co.uk/articles/interview_with_sean_mcmeekin
	...Curiously, Poincaré had taken a harder line in the First Balkan War in 1912 than Russia's Foreign Minister, Sazonov, all but urging the Russians to take the plunge and mobilize (after which, he assumed, Vienna and Berlin would mobilize too) -- so there was a recent precedent in his thinking for a Balkan pretext leading to war with Germany. 

	As for why Poincaré took such a hard line, and encouraged Russia's early mobilization -- that remains one of the great questions of the July crisis.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT250&lpg=PT250
	...The infiltration of the police and the secret-service outlook into the higher policy-making levels of the Czarist state was no less evident in foreign than in domestic affairs. The Okhrana was particularly active in Paris, a major center of émigré revolutionary activities. It operated much as the GPU and the MVD were later to do. The chief agent was usually attached to the Russian Embassy with the rank of counselor; he rendered no accounts to the ambassador but was authorized to correspond with his chiefs through the diplomatic pouch. Co-operation between the Okhrana unit in Paris and the French Sureté was always close in the pre-war years.

	...To neutralize the chronic protest of French Socialists and Liberals against its operations on French soil, the Okhrana bribed French newspapers and journalists of the right who were willing to follow a pro-Russian line. According to an exposé of the Okhrana written in 1919 by one of its former senior officials, V. K. Agafonov, it financed a journalists’ club in Paris and paid regular subsidies to several important French newspapers, including the Echo de Paris, the Gaulois, and the Figaro. The last-named organ, according to Agafonov, for a while received 24,000 rubles—about $10,000—monthly from the Okhrana.

	When Izvolsky took over the Russian Embassy in Paris he promoted an arrangement with the French government for influencing French opinion that was more official, but hardly less conspiratorial, than the crude undercover operations of the Okhrana: the Russians would open a special credit, drawn upon the Czar’s secret funds, for the French government, which would then undertake to buy up the consciences—and the pens—of its own journalists in behalf of joint objectives. A letter sent by the Russian Prime Minister in October 1912 to his French opposite number—at that time Poincaré—pointed out one of the advantages of the proposed system: It would help keep within bounds “certain appetites and certain rivalries” in the French press which the Russians had learned from bitter experience were apt to be stirred up when they approached foreign journalists directly.

	There was another advantage that the Russian communication did not spell out but which Poincaré may have been able to read between the lines. There was another advantage that the Russian communication did not spell out but which Poincaré may have been able to read between the lines. Izvolsky looked upon the dry, little Lorrainer, with his implacable irredentism, as the heaven-sent instrument of Russian foreign policy in France—“If Poincaré were defeated it would be a catastrophe for us,” he warned St. Petersburg before the French presidential elections of 1913—and one of the secret objectives of the press campaign that Russia was proposing to finance was to combat the “pacifist”—we would say today “appeasement”—and therefore anti-Poincaré, elements in French public life. “Do not forget,” Izvolsky once wrote his nominal chief in St. Petersburg, “that Poincare has to struggle with very influential elements in his own party which are generally hostile to Russia and openly preach that France must not be dragged into any war arising out of Balkan affairs.”


https://www.quora.com/To-what-extent-was-Russia-more-responsible-for-the-outbreak-of-WW1
	Russia coordinated with its French allies in mid July, in a state visit by the perpetually belligerent President Poincarre, and significantly, without any official records being kept. Russia had already started mobilizing before Serbia had even been presented the July 23rd demarche, by Austria.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT304&lpg=PT304
	...Even before the sheer velocity of events became intolerable, the Russian Foreign Minister, Sazonov ... had committed a momentous blunder. After the Austrian ultimatum to Serbia he obtained the agreement of the Cabinet and the approval of the Czar to the principle of a partial mobilization of Russian forces—involving a little over 1,000,000 men—along the Austrian border. This move, Sazonov argued, might scare the Austrians out of attacking Serbia, but would not threaten Germany, and in any case a soothing note to Berlin would accompany public announcement of the call-up.

	...If the Czar had stuck to his refusal not to let Russian mobilization go beyond the limited call-up in the south, peace might have been saved (although the Russian Generals had already begun surreptitiously to exceed the terms of the Imperial ukase). But between 3 and 4 P.M. on July 30, just as Bethmann-Hollweg in Berlin was drafting new instructions to his Ambassador in Vienna advising him that Germany “must decline to be drawn wantonly into a world conflagration without having any regard paid to our counsels,” Nicholas’ vacillant will suddenly buckled.

	It was Sazonov who effected this fatal result. Accompanied by a staff officer, he came to the Peterhof Palace, some 17 miles out of the capital, to try to convince the Czar that general mobilization could no longer be delayed. For more than an hour, in deferential but urgent tones, he marshaled his arguments in favor of mobilization. He had two particularly strong ones: a somewhat vague report that Germany, too, had begun to mobilize, and the arrogant tone of the Kaiser’s latest telegram declaring that he could not mediate in Vienna if Russia went ahead with the partial mobilization against Austria.

	...“Think of the responsibility you are asking me to take if I follow your advice!” he finally exclaimed. “Think what it means to send thousands and thousands of men to their death.”

	Unluckily, Sazonov’s companion, General Tatishev, chose that moment to speak up.

	“Yes, it is a terrible decision to take,” he said.

	“I am the one who decides,” Nicholas snapped.

	From then on he seemed more attentive to Sazonov’s arguments. He was particularly impressed by the Foreign Minister’s view—an erroneous one we now know—that Germany was bent on war and would go ahead whether Russia mobilized or not. At last, after what seemed a terrible inner struggle, the Czar gave in.

	“All right, Serge Dimitrievitch,” he said, “telephone the Chief of the General Staff that I give the order for general mobilization.”


https://books.google.com/books?id=hU8lHfT4F5wC&pg=393
	...Mobilisation was ordered, and the tsar’s apparent decisiveness was rewarded with the support of the country’s socialists, while pacifst dissenters had no choice but to scatter into exile. The unity of the Russian people when faced by a national challenge would, it was hoped, expect a spiritual renewal and restore respect for the tsar. The immediate effect of the mobilisation, however, was merely to provoke Germany to respond in kind.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT314&lpg=PT314
	On August 1, at 7 P.M. Count Friedrich von Pourtales, the German Ambassador to Russia, red in the face and laboring under the nervous strain of a sleepless week, entered the office of Sazonov, whose amiable features were unusually taut. Rather brusquely the Germans asked whether the Russian government was disposed to give a satisfactory answer to the ultimatum presented by Germany the day before and timed to run out at noon. Receiving an evasive answer, he repeated his question, in a staccato voice. Once again Sazonov replied that the Russians could not demobilize, but that they were, as before, prepared to continue negotiations for a peaceful settlement. Both men were on their feet. The Count fumbled in his pocket and drew out the German declaration of war, which he read, breathing hard as he reached the final sentence:

		“His Majesty the Emperor, my august sovereign, accepts the challenge in the name of the Empire and considers himself at war with Russia.”

	Then, losing all control of himself, he ran to the window which looked out over the Winter Palace reddened by the evening sun, and turning his back on Sazonov, burst into tears. Sazonov wordlessly patted his shoulder, whereupon Pourtales burst out, “Never did I think that I would have to leave St. Petersburg under such conditions.” The two diplomats, who were also old friends, embraced each other, in the Russian style, for the last time.


http://www.newworldencyclopedia.org/entry/Assassination_of_Archduke_Franz_Ferdinand#Russian_military_attach.C3.A9.27s_office
	Serbian reservists being transported on tramp steamers on the Danube, apparently accidentally, crossed onto the Austro-Hungarian side of the river at Temes-Kubin and Austro-Hungarian soldiers fired into the air to warn them off. This incident was blown out of proportion and Austria-Hungary then declared war and mobilized its army on July 28, 1914. Under the Secret Treaty of 1892 Russia and France were obliged to mobilize their armies if any of the Triple Alliance mobilized. Soon all the Great Powers (except Italy) had chosen sides and gone to war.


&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books?id=vQF099JYW_EC&pg=PA46&lpg=PA46
	Rounding out the picture of selective recordkeeping inside the Franco-Russian alliance, there are substantial gaps in Russia's own diplomatic correspondence with its envoys in Paris and Belgrade in July 1914, in the latter case for ten whole days following the assassination of the archduke on 28 June. Did the Russians have something to hide? The gaps in the record strongly suggest a good deal of purging took place after 1914. Missing files from Imperial Russia's Ministry of Foreign Affairs are particularly noteworthy, worthy, in that following the October Revolution, Soviet researchers had no compunction in publishing the most incriminating documents they could find in order to indict the benighted "imperialism" of the old regime.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT263&lpg=PT263
	...There may be one man still alive who knows the whole story; the Russian assistant military attaché, Captain Alexander Werchovski, who replaced Artamanov during his absence. A friend of Werchovski, a Polish nobleman named Louis de Trydar-Burzynski, stated in his memoirs, published in Italy in 1926, that “the assassination [at Sarajevo] was perpetrated with the support of the Russian military attaché at Belgrade, Captain Werchovski...” Werchovski, he continued, “was later War Minister in the Kerensky government; he was a young man whom I had known very well for years, and he told me quite frankly the truth about the origins, preparations and execution of the plot.” Unfortunately, Werchovski, if he is living today, is not likely to tell any more about the case; when last heard of, he held a high command in the Red Army—a curious detail in itself.


&nbsp;


http://www.pieria.co.uk/articles/interview_with_sean_mcmeekin
	**So France wanted Alsace, Russia wanted the Straits, Germany had some vague desire for Lebensraum and a vague fear of encirclement, and Britain was thinking about Home Rule for Ireland. Not very good reasons to plunge a peaceful and prosperous Europe into hell. And yet, the people of Europe went to war in August 1914 with joy and brass bands and parades. Was it 99 years of peace that lulled them into war? Or an atavistic desire for violence and boredom with bourgeois prosperity?**

	Few historians still see things quite this way. There were a few parades, many volunteered to take up arms, and open opposition to the draft was rare, but the idea that the common people of Europe all marched off happily to war is no longer tenable. Entire books have been written by specialists to debunk "the myth of war enthusiasm," most recently by Mike Neiberg (Dance of the Furies. Europe and the Outbreak of World War I, Harvard 2011). Certainly many young men (most famously Hitler) welcomed the break from dull routine, the cameradie of military life and so on: but most people seem to have reacted to the war's outbreak more with trepidation and terror than bloodlust. 

	And this, mind you, is after the war began, with the national press in each belligerent already baying for blood. In its origins, the war of 1914 was almost purely a "Cabinet war," with even the invocation of "public opinion" (let alone the real thing) playing next to no role in the decisions to mobilize (with the curious exception of Russia, the least democratic and nationalist-patriotic of all the initial belligerents). 

	The fact that the war of 1914 was a Cabinet war does not make the story any less troubling, however. To me, it is, if anything, more unsettling that a conflict of such world-shattering proportions could be conjured up by such a small handful of men. 


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT263&lpg=PT263
	...Like the treason of Redl, the intrigues of Izvolsky, and the conspiratorial Witches’ Sabbath of the Okhrana, the murderers at Sarajevo demonstrate that overlaying the local power vacuum in south-eastern Europe caused by the breakup or decrepitude of the Habsburg and Ottoman Empires, there was a vacuum of responsibility affecting a much wider area. Responsible government was beginning to collapse under the strains of the modern age, just as civilization was beginning to crumble, in all the autocracies—and in some of their more-or-less democratic allies. (In the Balkans responsible government had never existed, at least not for centuries.) The breakdown, it is true, was limited; the regression to barbarism was noticeable only in certain contexts, the relapse into anarchy was confined to certain sectors. Philosophers continued to philosophize, and the plumbing, where it already existed, worked as well as ever. The trains ran—often on time—mail was delivered and taxes collected: drunkards were jailed and prostitutes had their cards stamped. Only the higher policy-coordinating centers of the state were affected. How grievously, was demonstrated, not only by Sarajevo, but as we shall now see, by the failure of the Old World diplomacy to prevent the crisis inevitably engendered by it from ending in the general European war that virtually nobody in Europe wanted.


http://www.pieria.co.uk/articles/interview_with_sean_mcmeekin
	**You have written three books about the origins of the First World War. What makes this topic so compelling?**

	The biggest draw for me as a historian is the stakes. The war of 1914 had such profound, and predominantly negative, consequences -- four years of industrial-scale slaughter all but destroying western faith in human progress, the violent break-up of empires which had endured for centuries, the bloodletting begat by the Russian Revolution and Civil War, the rise of fascism, Nazism, and all the rest. And yet the war, I have come to learn, did not have to happen, at least when and in the manner that it did. Many structural factors -- industrialization and the arms race, empires and alliances, nationalism and the spread of near-universal military service across Europe -- helped produce the carnage of 1914-1918 once the Great War broke out, but they did not cause the war, which could easily have been avoided had various contingent events, actions and reactions not transpired precisely they way they did in 1914.



https://www.smithsonianmag.com/history/gavrilo-princips-sandwich-79480741/
	...the archduke’s chauffeur, a stranger to Sarajevo, gets lost. He swings off Appel Quay and into crowded Franz Joseph Street, then drifts to a stop right in front of Schiller’s.

	...Schiller’s delicatessen stood on the original route planned for Franz Ferdinand’s motorcade; indeed, the chauffeur’s fatal uncertainty was caused by the local governor, Oskar Potiorek, shouting at him from the passenger seat that he had should have stayed on Appel Quay. In other words, Princip was standing in precisely the right place to assassinate the archduke if the Franz Ferdinand had stuck to his plans, and so could hardly be said to be the beneficiary of some outlandish coincidence.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT304&lpg=PT304
	...If the Czar had stuck to his refusal not to let Russian mobilization go beyond the limited call-up in the south, peace might have been saved


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT287&lpg=PT287
	...[Hartwig] is believed to have broken off his originally close relationship with the fanatical brotherhood’s head, Colonel Apis, and in general, to have started putting the brakes on extreme Serbian nationalism, which he had earlier encouraged. His influence on the Serbian government was enormous; if his personal outlook on the Balkan problem had really changed as much as many historians think, his death at that crucial moment was undoubtedly a catastrophe for Europe. Giesl himself believed so. He later wrote that if Hartwig had lived beyond the “critical 25th of July,” the war would not have occurred.


http://www.pieria.co.uk/articles/interview_with_sean_mcmeekin
	**Had Gavrilo Princip missed, or had Archduke Francis Ferdinand left Sarajevo after the first failed assassination attempt (as his security detail advised), or had his driver not taken a wrong turn, would a World War broken out at some later date? In other words, was the assassination a spark that ignited an unstable international situation that would have probably exploded at some later date or can we just as easily imagine a Europe that would have remained peaceful for another 99 years?**

	This is one of the great counterfactuals of modern history. I do believe that, had Princip missed or the Archduke taken more sensible precautions for his own safety after the failed bombing attempt, nearly all subsequent history would have taken a different path. 

	...Might there have been a general European conflagration at some future point? One can never rule out worst-case scenarios, but there is nothing which would have made war any more likely than in the years before 1914, absent the precise sequence of events which transpired following Sarajevo


http://www.newworldencyclopedia.org/entry/Assassination_of_Archduke_Franz_Ferdinand#Russian_military_attach.C3.A9.27s_office 
	It could be argued that this assassination set in motion most of the major events of the twentieth century, with its reverberations lingering into the twenty-first. The Treaty of Versailles at the end of the First World War is generally linked to the rise of Adolf Hitler and World War II. It also led to the Russian Revolution, which helped lead to the Cold War. This, in turn, led to many of the major political developments of the twentieth century, such as the fall of the colonial empires and the rise of the United States and the Soviet Union to super-power status.


http://www.pieria.co.uk/articles/interview_with_sean_mcmeekin
	...My argument is not really that Russia is more responsible for the outbreak of war than the other two, but rather that the war which actually resulted in August 1914 was the war Russian policymakers preferred, not the one the Austrians or Germans wanted.

	...Whatever the merits of Bethmann's policies in July 1914, and I think they were disastrous, it is hard to escape the conclusion that the ultimate German nightmare of "encirclement" actually came true in 1914. Like cornered animals, the Germans lashed out, and they have much to answer for. But so, too, do the Bosnian Serb terrorists who assassinated Franz Ferdinand, the Austrian leaders who pushed for a war with Serbia, the statesmen in Paris and St. Petersburg who capitalized on the inept diplomacy of Berlin and Vienna to corner the Germans, and those in London who turned the European conflict into a world war. It did not have to happen.


------


The Bolshevik revolution wouldn't have been able to happen without the war:


http://alphahistory.com/worldwar1/russian-revolution/
	The effects of World War I gave rise to the Russian Revolution of 1917. By the end of 1916, two years of total war had placed enormous strain on all combatant nations. None felt this more severely than Russia, which had entered the war confident but in a precarious political, economic and social state. The Russian economy made great industrial advances in the two decades prior to 1914, but it was still under-developed and ill-equipped to supply a prolonged war. Russia’s government was still dominated by the tsarist autocracy, which claimed political authority that was divine rather than popular. The Russian people were already fractious, dissatisfied and eager for change. In 1905 their demands had taken the empire to the brink of revolution, before tensions were eased with promises of reform – promises that were never truly fulfilled. The Russian empire rested on what historian Orlando Figes called ‘unstable pillars’, and they were unable to sustain its involvement in one of the most intense wars in history.

	At the epicentre of this turmoil was Nicholas II, tsar of all the Russias. Most historians agree that Nicholas was not equipped for governing Russia through difficult times. He was the son of an over-bearing autocrat and the grandson of a reformer, but was himself incapable of being either. Nicholas was determined to cling to autocratic power but he was blind to the problems this created and the threats it posed to his throne. The tsar professed to love the Russian people, yet he turned the other way when hungry workers were shot in January 1905, and when striking miners were machine-gunned in Siberia in 1912. Nicholas instead blamed Russia’s troubles on others: on foreign liberal ideas, on anarchists, on trouble-makers in the universities and on Jews (like many Russian conservatives he was an embittered anti-Semite). The tsar drew his advice and counsel from an inner circle of ministers, military officers, aristocrats and bishops – but too often they told Nicholas whatever he wished to hear, rather than what he should.

	The rapid descent into war in 1914 had caught the tsar unaware. Nicholas knew the German kaiser well enough to know he was ambitious and prone to rash decisions; but he did not think Wilhelm so treacherous that he would declare war on the empire of his own cousin. Nicholas made the first of several blunders in July 1914 when he appointed his cousin, Grand Duke Nicholas Nikolaevich, as commander-in-chief of the army. Nikolaevich had military training as a cavalry officer but had never commanded an army in battle; he now found himself in charge of one of the largest armies in history. In August 1914 the tsar and Nikolaevich – aware that most German forces would be occupied with the Schlieffen Plan in the west – planned an invasion of East Prussia. It was a bold campaign that might have succeeded if not for poor planning and leadership. The two Russian field commanders, Alexander Samsonov and Pavel von Rennenkampf, were competent officers but were both over-confident and vainglorious. They were also bitter rivals who could barely stand the sight of one another. Their squabbling and inept decision-making contributed to a disastrous defeat at the Battle of Tannenberg in late August 1914. Unable to face reporting the loss of 150,000 troops to the tsar, Samsonov took his own life.

	This culture of unaccountability and military incompetence was ingrained in much of the Russian military. After a year of fighting and several costly defeats, the exasperated Nicholas II decided to personally take command of the army. In September 1915, against the advice of his ministers, he dismissed Nikolaevich and proceeded to the frontline. The decision proved telling for two reasons. Nicholas’ distance from the Eastern Front in 1914 and early 1915 had buffered him from much criticism; his generals had instead footed the blame for military disasters. Now, the tsar would be responsible for every defeat, shattering the divine infallibility that many superstitious Russians believed he had.

	...By February 1917 the situation in Russia’s cities had become critical. Shortages of food and fuel were dire: the capitol city, since re-named Petrograd, needed sixty railway cars of food a day but often received barely a third of this amount. Inflation had been so severe through 1916 that the rouble had just a quarter of its pre-war buying power. In February, when a women’s day march through Petrograd merged with angry bread queues, the unrest spilled over into revolution. Soldiers ordered to fire on the crowd refused and shot their officers instead. The tsarina’s response was dismissive, writing off the unrest as a “hooligan movement”. Things eventually became so dire that the tsar decided to return from the front – but he was halted along the way by striking railway workers. While waiting on train sidings in Pskov, Nicholas II was met by his generals and members of the Duma (the national parliament). All but one demanded he sign an instrument of abdication, which Nicholas eventually did. More than 300 years of Romanov rule were brought to an end with the swish of a pen in a stranded railway cart.

	In different times, the departure of tsarism might have paved the way for a brighter future for Russia. The Provisional Government that replaced the tsarist regime did introduce some liberal reforms, like freedoms of assembly and the press, and amnesties for political prisoners. But facing international pressure, it refused to end Russian involvement in the war. The defeats, military follies, casualty lists and food shortages continued, and after six months the Provisional Government’s popularity had slumped.



Only an organization hostile to Russia would back the Bolsheviks. The Bolshevik revolution would have been impossible without the war:



https://answers.yahoo.com/question/index?qid=20070928114420AAFrayY
	Ludendorff certainly did support German-backing for Lenin to stir up revolution in Russia; and then to sustain the Bolsheviks in power. Ludendorff was not the only German leader to pursue this course. Indeed, German policy and actions to support Russian revolutionaries originated well before Ludendorff came to power. The German High Command consistently approved this activity, for the good military reason of destroying Russia’s ability to wage war.

	As “russkimuzhik” states, “Parvus” (Israel Lazarevich Gelfand) was the agent through whom the German government chose to channel its financial support. From early 1915 onwards, Germany funded Parvus with substantial sums of money to finance Russian revolutionaries.

	It was Parvus who persuaded Germany to focus its support on Lenin’s Bolshevik revolutionary faction, instead of spreading the money around amongst other anti-Tsar groups. Bolshevik policy seemed ideally suited to Germany’s aims, because the Bolsheviks aimed to make peace with Germany if ever they took power in Russia. In April 1917, a German-Bolshevik agreement was finalized on paper, and Germany set up the arrangements for Lenin and his cronies to be ferried from Switzerland, across Germany and Sweden by train, so that he could return to Russia via Finland.

	But if any pact existed between Ludendorff and Lenin it was one of temporary convenience, patching over mutual mistrust and deception. Ludendorff may have been saying to himself, "Lenin will overthrow the Russian patriots, and then I will strangle Lenin and his friends". But Lenin was thinking, "I shall pass through Germany in Ludendorff's train, but for his services I shall pay Ludendorff in my own way". His farewell letter to the Swiss workers, written on the day of his departure, leaves no doubt as to his intentions towards Germany. "We will carry on a revolutionary struggle against the German bourgeoisie.”

	Germany continued to fund Lenin after the Bolshevik revolution succeeded. Now, Ludendorff’s aim was to keep in power a Russian government that was committed to ending the war.

	Later, of course, after communist revolutionaries had attempted to overthrow the German government, Ludendorff tried to absolve himself and the entire German military from having aided Lenin. He claimed that German support for the Bolsheviks had been a mistaken policy of German civilian administrations (particularly of Bethmann-Hollweg). This is not true. The German High Command may not have originated Germany’s “support Lenin” policy. But Ludendorff and his colleagues wholeheartedly endorsed the policy.

	Source(s): "The Forgotten Peace, Brest-Litovsk March 1918"
	by John W. Wheeler-Bennett. 

	"Germany and the Revolution in Russia, 1915-1918: Documents from the Archives of the German Foreign Ministry" by Z. A. B. Zeman 


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
	The Minister in Stockholm to the Foreign Ministry

	2 May 1917

	Herr von Heidenstam considers that report is very likely true, as both the political line Lenin is pursuing and his peace propaganda are completely independent, and he is thus now in a position of violent opposition to the government. According to a report received today from the Telegram Bureau, he has been summoned before the Workers' Council for this reason. 

	There have been large demonstrations in favour of peace, led by students, in front of Kazan cathedral, at which violent speeches were made against England and the United States, and more moderate ones against France. The assassination of General Katshalinski is considered significant because he was a spokesman of the new government. 

	Anarchy is on the increase. Lucius 


https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Anton_Denikin&diff=prev&oldid=137943839
	Denikin was a talented writer, and even before World War I has written several pieces in which he analytically criticized the shortcomings of his beloved Russian Army.


https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
	The Russian turmoil; memoirs: military, social, and political
	by Denikin, Anton Ivanovich

	...I have more grounds and more right to speak of the Army and in the name of the Army than all those strangers of the Socialist Camp, who, in their haughty self-conceit, as soon as they touched the Army, began breaking down its foundations, judging its leaders and fighters and diagnosing its serious disease, who even now, after grievous experiments and experiences, have not given up the hope of transforming this mighty and terrible weapon of national self-preservation into a means for satisfying party and social appetites. For me, the Army is not only an historical, social, national phenomenon, but nearly the whole of my life, in which lie many memories, precious and not to be forgotten, in which all is bound up and interlaced into one general mass of swiftly passing days of sadness and of joy, in which there are hundreds of cherished graves, of buried dreams and unextinguish- able faith.

	...Then came a torrent of newspapers, appeals, resolutions, orders, from some unknown authority, and with them a whole series of new ideas, which the soldier masses were unable to digest and assimilate. New people appeared, with a new speech, so fascinating and promising, liberating the soldiers from obedience and inspiring hope that they would be saved from deadly danger immediately. When one Regimental Commander naively inquired whether these people might not be tried by Field Court-Martial and shot, his telegram, after passing through all official stages, called forth the reply from Petrograd that these people were inviolable, and had been sent by the Soviet to the troops for the very purpose of explaining to them the true meaning of current events. 

	When such leaders of the Revolutionary Democracy, as have not yet lost their feeling of responsibility for crucified Russia, now say that the movement, caused by the deep class differences between the officers and the soldiers and by " the enslavement " of the latter, was of an elemental nature, which they could not resist, this is deeply untrue. 

	All the fundamental slogans, all the programmes, tactics, instructions and text-books, forming the foundation of the ' democratisation " of the Army, had been drawn up by the military sections of the secret Socialist parties long before the War, outside of " elemental " pressure, on the grounds of clear, cold calculation, as a product of " Socialist reasoning and conscience." 

	True, the officers strove to persuade the men not to believe the " new words " and to do their duty. But from the very beginning the Soviets had declared the officers to be foes of the Revolution; in many towns they had been subjected to cruel torture and death, and this with impunity. Evidently not without some reason, when even the " Bourgeois " Duma issued such a strange and unexpected " announcement " as the following: " This first day of March, rumours were spread among the soldiers of the garrison of Petrograd to the effect that the officers in the regiments were disarming the soldiers. These rumours were investigated and found to be false. As President of the Military Commission of the Provisional Committee of the State Duma, I declare that the most decided measures will be taken to prevent such action on the part of the officers, up to the shooting of those guilty of it. Signed, Colonel Engelhardt." 

	Next came Order No. I., the Declaration and so forth.



https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/lfafar/first.htm
	 V. I. Lenin
	Letters From Afar

	...Though leadership of the Soviet was in the hands of compromising elements, the pressure of the militant workers and soldiers compelled it to take a number of revolutionary measures—the arrest of tsarist officials, release of political prisoners, etc.

	On March 1 (14), the Soviet issued its “Order No. 1 to the Petrograd Garrison”. It played a very big part in revolutionising the army. Henceforth all military units were to be guided in their political actions solely by the Soviet, all weapons were to be placed at the disposal and under the control of company and battalion soldiers’ committees, orders issued by the Provisional Committee of the State Duma were to be obeyed only if they did not conflict with the orders of the Soviet, etc. 



https://encyclopedia.1914-1918-online.net/article/eastern_front#1917__Russia_E2_80_99s_Dying_Gasp
	Most also insisted on maintaining military discipline — with some easing of the draconian punishments so infamous in the Russian Army, but even this clashed with the revolutionary sentiment of the day. The Petrograd Soviet of Workers, Soldiers, and Sailors—the leading revolutionary political body in the city, though technically it shared power with the Duma—issued both “Order Number One” and “The Declaration of the Rights of the Soldier.” These called for equality among the soldiers, with no insignia of rank to be used, an end to saluting, and unit votes on any proposed military action, among other things. Many commanders resigned, recognizing that it was impossible to conduct affairs in this manner. 

	...On 19 July, the Germans counter-attacked toward Tarnopol; the Russian formations opposing them simply vanished. The Central Powers advanced twelve kilometers on the first day of the offensive and captured Tarnopol on 25 July. By early August, the Russians had evacuated both Galicia and the Bukovina, surrendering all of the gains of 1916. In the chaotic flight to the rear, soldiers shot their officers and simply began walking home. For all intents and purposes, Russia disposed of no organized military force south of the Pripet Marshes. The counter-offensive nonetheless ground to a halt at the Galician border. Austria-Hungary had no further reserves to dedicate to the attack, and the Germans needed every available man on the Western Front. For the moment, Russia was spared. 



https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
	The Russian turmoil; memoirs: military, social, and political
	by Denikin, Anton Ivanovich

	...Nine a.m. The first Company gradually begins to awaken.  The trenches are incredibly defiled; in the narrow communication  trenches and those of the second line the air is thick and close.  The parapet is crumbling away. No one troubles to repair it; no  one feels inclined to do so, and there are not enough men in the  Company. There is a large number of deserters; more than fifty  have been allowed to go. Old soldiers have been demobilised,  others have gone on leave with the arbitrary permission of the  Committee. Others, again, have been elected members of  numerous Committees, or gone away as delegates; a while ago,  for instance, the Division sent a numerous delegation to " Com-  rade " Kerensky to verify whether he had really given orders  for an advance. Finally, by threats and violence, the soldiers have  so terrorised the regimental surgeons that the latter have been  issuing medical certicates even to the " thoroughly fit." 

	In the trenches the hours pass slowly and wearily, in dullness  and idleness. In one corner men are playing cards, in another a  soldier returned from leave is lazily and listlessly telling a story;  the air is full of obscene swearing. Someone reads aloud from  the Russian Messenger the following : 

	" The English want the Russians to shed the last drop of their  blood for the greater glory of England, who seeks her profit in  everything. . . . Dear soldiers, you must know that Russia  would have concluded peace long ago had not England prevented  her. . . . We must turn away from her — the Russian people  demand it; such is their sacred will." 


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/sep/06.htm
	 V. I.   Lenin
	Lessons of the Revolution

	...The people want peace. Yet the revolutionary government of free Russia has resumed the war of conquest on the basis of those very same secret treaties which ex-Tsar Nicholas II concluded with the British and French capitalists so that the Russian capitalists might plunder other nations. Those secret treaties remain unpublished. The government of free Russia resorted to subterfuges, and to this day has not proposed a just peace to all nations. 


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
	The Minister in Bern to the Chancellor 

	Bern, 30 September 1915 

	The Estonian Keskiila 1 has succeeded in finding out the conditions on which the Russian revolutionaries would be prepared to conclude peace with us in the event of the revolution being successful.

	According to information from the well-known revolutionary Lenin, the programme contains the following points : 

	1 . The establishment of a republic. 

	2. The confiscation of large land-holdings. 

	3. The eight-hour working day. 

	4. Full autonomy for all nationalities. 

	5. An offer of peace without any consideration for France, but on condition that Germany renounces all annexations and war-reparations. 

	On Point 5, Keskiila has observed that this condition does not exclude the possibility of separating those national states from Russia which would serve as buffer states.


	
https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
	The Minister in Bern to the Chancellor 

	April 1917 

	Platten, who had accompanied the Russian revolutionary Lenin and his followers on their journey through Germany, visited me today to thank me on their behalf for services rendered. Unfortunately Platten was prevented from accompanying his fellow travellers to Russia. He was stopped at the frontier by an English officer, who cancelled his entry permit. 

	Lenin, on the other hand, received a splendid welcome from his followers. It can be said that three-quarters of Petrograd workers are behind him. The propaganda among the soldiers is more difficult ; the opinion seems to be widespread among them that we are going to attack them.

	It is not clear yet which course the revolution will take. Perhaps it will be enough to substitute several members of the Provisional Government, like Miliukov and Guchkov, by socialists. In any case it would be absolutely necessary to increase the number of the partisans of peace by an influx from abroad. It is therefore recommended that those emigrants who are prepared to leave should receive the same facilities as Lenin and his comrades. The greatest speed is recommended, as it is to be feared that the Entente will exercise pressure on the Swiss government to prevent their departure. 



http://digitalcommons.brockport.edu/cgi/viewcontent.cgi?article=1000&context=hashtaghistory
	Russia demanded that Poland, and especially the capital city of Warsaw, be returned to them.  Not surprisingly , Ludendorff and the rest of the High Command flatly refused to entertain such ridiculous demands . Poland was theirs now. The German Governor - General of Warsaw, von Beseler believed that Poland’s manpower could be harnessed to bolster Germany’s numbers in the field. He proposed that Poland be declared independent with the stipulation of a minimum three regiment strong volunteer Polish army who would fight for the Central Powers. Ludendorff approved of this plan and although Bethmann - Hollweg did not think it would work, he did not actively resist it because he was largely unsupported and outnumbered by the military leaders.

	However, once the plan was put in place, the military leaders were quickly disappointed. Most Poles believed that even if they fought for Germany they would receive neither compensation nor gratitude. Instead they chose to passively resist all German machinations. Instead of adding to Germany’s strength, Poland became another problem.

	Here is a case where a purely political matter where peace with Russia could have been possible. However, Ludendorff’s expansionist innuendos in the peace note to the rest of the Allied Powers sabotaged real efforts to end the war. Instead, the military sphere was allowed to encroach into a political affair over the chancellor of the political sphere. What is even more astonishing is the sheer lack of reflection by the military leaders. Ludendorff was fixated on winning the war, yet even through a purely military - oriented lens, Ludendorff failed to recognize that conceding a small piece of territory to Russia in exchange for peace would have eliminated a major front in the war and given him an opportunity to win through military means. 


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
	Some of the men who took part in the formulation of German  war-time policy recorded their experiences. But the memoirs of  Ludendorff, Kuhlmann, Hoffmann, or Erzberger do not enlighten the reader much as to the official attitude towards the  revolution in Russia. They may have been unaware of the  consistency of the policy as Bergen conducted it; they may  have regarded it as an incident which should remain hidden in  the government archives, or they may have just forgotten. Kuhlmann certainly knew about it but chose to be uninformative in his memoirs. Ludendorff, when referring to Lenin's journey  across Germany, did so with 'bated breath'.


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
	The Austro-Hungarian Foreign Minister to the Chancellor 

	Vienna, 10 November 1917 

	...Lenin could then easily make advances towards a separate peace with us within the terms of his programme, and could proceed to the conclusion of an armistice. Since the Maximalists' programme includes the concession of the right to self-determination of the non-Russian peoples of Russia, the question of what should finally be done with Congress Poland, Courland, Livonia, and Finland could well be left to be decided in the course of peace negotiations. It would be our business to ensure that the desire for separation from Russia and for political and economic dependence on the Central Powers be voiced from within these nations. In view of what I have said, I therefore believe that we could influence the development of the situation in Russia favourably to our aims


https://encyclopedia.1914-1918-online.net/article/peace_initiatives
	International Encyclopedia of the First World War
	Peace Initiatives

	...In early 1917, Bethmann Hollweg saw Russia’s revolution as an opportunity to end the war in the east on terms favorable to Germany. To explore the possibility of a separate peace, he allowed talks to proceed between Matthias Erzberger (1875-1921), the leader of the left wing of the Center Party, and a Russian diplomat, Joseph von Kolyshko, in Stockholm in March-April 1917. The deal worked out between them in part called for restoring Russia’s pre-1914 border, perhaps with some frontier changes, and for creating a new Polish state that would hold a plebiscite to determine whether or not it would be under Russian sovereignty. Bethmann Hollweg had more demanding terms in mind, however. He and other civilian leaders in Germany wanted Poland and the Baltics to be “autonomous” – free from Russian control – and open to German economic influence and ethnically German settlement. Germany’s military leaders wanted the outright annexation of Courland and Lithuania as well as other frontier adjustments at Russia’s expense. With the Russians less eager for a separate peace than a general one and in any case hopeful of keeping their western borderlands in their sphere of influence, even Bethmann Hollweg’s more moderate terms doomed the Erzberger-Kolyshko talks as well as other German-Russian contacts.


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/may/09.htm
	 V. I.   Lenin
	The “Virtual Armistice”

	...We are told that an armistice has been established only on one front, and therefore there is a danger of a separate peace. But this argument does not hold water. If neither the Russian Government nor the Russian workers and peasants want a separate peace with the German capitalists (our Party, as we know, through Pravda and in the resolution passed at our Conference, which spoke in the name of the Party as a whole, has repeatedly protested against such a peace) 


https://www.britannica.com/event/treaties-of-Brest-Litovsk
	Treaties of Brest-Litovsk, peace treaties signed at Brest-Litovsk (now in Belarus) by the Central Powers with the Ukrainian Republic (Feb. 9, 1918) and with Soviet Russia (March 3, 1918), which concluded hostilities between those countries during World War I. Peace negotiations, which the Soviet government had requested on Nov. 8, 1917, began on December 22. They were divided into several sessions, during which the Soviet delegation tried to prolong the proceedings and took full advantage of its opportunity to issue propaganda statements, while the Germans grew increasingly impatient.

	When no substantial progress had been made by January 18, the German general Max Hoffmann firmly presented the German demands, which included the establishment of independent states in the Polish and Baltic territories formerly belonging to the Russian Empire and in Ukraine. Leon Trotsky, head of the Soviet delegation since January 9, called for a recess (January 18–30). He returned to Petrograd where he persuaded the reluctant Bolsheviks (including Lenin) to adopt a policy under which Russia would leave the war but sign no peace treaty (“neither war nor peace”).

	When negotiations resumed, the Soviet delegation again tried to stall; but after the Central Powers concluded a separate peace with the nationalist Ukrainian delegation (February 9), Trotsky announced the new Soviet policy. Negotiations came to a halt on February 10. But when the Germans renewed their military offensive (February 18), the Russians immediately requested that talks be resumed. On February 23, the Germans responded with an ultimatum allowing the Russians two days to open talks and three more to conclude them. Lenin, realizing that the new Soviet state was too weak to survive a continuation of the war, threatened to resign if the German terms were not met.


https://www.marxists.org/history/etol/newspape/ni/vol02/no01/lenin2.htm
	“Reproaches have been made against me because of the Ultimatum. I put it forward only in the extremest case. When our CC members talk about an international civil war, that is a mockery. We have the civil war in Russia, but not in Germany. Our agitation is going further, but we are not agitating with words but with the revolution. And that remains. Stalin is wrong when he says that we do not need to sign. We must sign these conditions. If you do not do this, then you will sign the death warrant of the Soviet power in three weeks. These conditions do not infringe upon the Soviet power. I do not waver in the slightest. I do not put the ultimatum in order to withdraw it again. I want no revolutionary phrase. The German revolution has not yet matured. That requires months. The conditions must be accepted. If a new ultimatum then comes, we shall have a new situation.” (Lenin, Sämtliche Werke, Vol. XXII, p. 297.)


https://encyclopedia.1914-1918-online.net/article/peace_initiatives
	The Stockholm conference would hopefully spur socialist and liberal elements in the Allied nations to pressure their governments into formally embracing the Petrograd formula. Once that happened, the governments of the Central Powers would see that negotiations were possible and, pressured by their own leftist groups at home, they would embrace talks to stop the fighting.


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/aug/17bcca.htm
	V. I.   Lenin
	To:   THE BUREAU OF THE CENTRAL COMMITTEE ABROAD

	...I consider participation in the Stockholm Conference, or in any other, with the Ministers (and scoundrels) Chernov, Tsereteli, Skobelev and their parties, to be direct betrayal, and will state this opinion in the press against all and sundry. If in the “Zimmerwald Commission” (judging by the report of the social-chauvinist Rozanov) it proved possible almost to reject Stockholm, or to half-reject it, this is very good. But “almost” and “half” are of no use at all, and all this “half”-social-chauvinist Zimmerwald Commission, which depends on the Italians and the Ledebourites, who desire “unity” with the social-chauvinists, is a most harmful institution.


https://books.google.com/books?id=vSHuCgAAQBAJ&pg=PA514&lpg=PA514
	The conference set up the International Socialist Commission, also known as the Zimmerwald Commission, made up of two Swiss, two Italians, and a Russian-born Italian resident, to work for an end to hostilities. Lenin opposed the majority line taken at Zimmerwald, criticizing the adoption of peace as the overriding goal. Instead he demanded socialist revolution, which might have required more fighting, and the formation of a new international socialist organization.


https://books.google.com/books?id=EmJODQAAQBAJ&pg=PT459&lpg=PT459
	...Bolshevik demagogy had disintegrated the Russian army as a force-in-being, and the Soviet government was virtually at the mercy of the victorious Germans. In a feeble attempt to exert counter-pressure the Bolsheviks intensified revolutionary agitation and propaganda among German or Austro-Hungarian prisoners of war held in Russia—a fateful step from the long-term viewpoint, but one without significant immediate results. Trotsky meanwhile used all the resources of his cunning to drag out the negotiations. Finally on March 3 after the German armies had resumed their advance, and were nearing Petrograd, the Soviet government accepted Ludendorff’s terms, signing away more than a quarter of Russia’s national territory and some 75 per cent of her coal and steel plants.

	The dissident Social Revolutionaries resigned from the government in protest against accepting such conditions, and the Bolsheviks themselves were badly split. Lenin had the greatest difficulty in persuading Trotsky to give up his dreams of resisting the German Army by sabotage and guerrilla warfare. The Whites in the south, encouraged by the demonstration of Bolshevik weakness and enraged by what they considered the Bolshevik betrayal of the national cause openly raised the standard of counter-revolution, with French and British support.

	By the spring of 1918 sizable White forces, led first by Alexeyev and Kornilov, then by Generals Krasnov and Anton Denikin, advanced from the northern Caucasus into the Don Basin, while Japanese military intervention in support of the local anti-Bolshevik forces began in the Far Eastern provinces. A combined British-Russian intervention force took shape on the Arctic coast at Murmansk. The Russian civil war, one of the most decisive conflicts in modem history—and also one of the cruelest—was under way. It was to rage back and forth across the former empire of the Czars—and even into some neighboring territories—until 1921, leaving famine and pestilence in its wake.


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/sep/01.htm
	 V. I.   Lenin
	They Do Not See the Wood for the Trees

	...First of all, Martov’s vacillation over the transfer of power to the Soviets is quite typical. Prior to July 4 Martov was against this slogan. After July 4, he was for it. Early in August, he was once more against it, and note his   monstrously illogical and amusing, from a Marxist point of view, argumentation. He is against it because, he says, “the actual balance of forces does not at present warrant the demand for power to be transferred to the Soviets. This could come only in the course of a civil war, which at the moment is impermissible”.

	What a muddle.

	... After July 4, the transfer of power to the Soviets became impossible without civil war, since, on July 4 and 5, power had passed to a military Bonapartist clique backed by the Cadets and the Black Hundreds. Hence, all Marxists, all those on the side of the revolutionary proletariat, all honest revolutionary democrats, must now explain to the workers and peasants the radical change in the situation which necessitates a new path for the transfer of power to the proletarians and semi-proletarians.

	 Martov has advanced no arguments in defence of his “idea” that civil war is impermissible “at the moment”, in defence of his statement that it is not his intention “to overthrow the present government”. Because his opinion is unsubstantiated, and particularly because he voiced it at a meeting of defencists, it inevitably smacks of the defencist argument that civil war is impermissible while the enemy threatens from without.



https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/may/09.htm
	 V. I.  Lenin
	The “Virtual Armistice”

	The Russian people have two programmes to choose from. One is the programme of the capitalists, adopted by the Chernovs and Tseretelis. This is the programme of offensive, the programme for dragging out the imperialist war, dragging out the carnage.

	The other programme is that of the world’s revolutionary workers, advocated in Russia by our Party. This programme says: stimulate fraternisation (but do not permit the Germans to deceive the Russians); fraternise by means of proclamations; extend fraternisation and a virtual armistice to all fronts; help to spread these in every possible way, thereby hastening the proletarian revolution in all the countries, giving at least a temporary respite to the soldiers of all the belligerent countries; hasten in Russia the transfer of power to the Soviets of Workers’, Soldiers’, and Peasants’ Deputies, and thereby hasten the conclusion of a really just, really universal peace in the interests of the working people, and not in the interests of the capitalists.

	Our government, with the Chernovs and Tseretelis, the Narodniks and the Mensheviks, is for the first programme.

	The majority of the Russian nation and of all the nations within Russia (and outside Russia), i.e., the majority of the workers and poor peasants, undoubtedly stand for the second programme.

	The victory of this second programme is drawing nearer every day.


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
	In the green field, among the barbed wire, a regular bazaar was going on. A group of Germans and of our men were bartering vodka, tobacco, lard, bread. Some way off a German officer reclined on the grass — red-faced, sturdy, with an arrogant look on his face — and carried on a conversation with a soldier named Soloveytchick; and, strange to say, the familiar and insolent Soloveytchick stood before the Lieutenant respectfully. 

	The Colonel pushed the observer aside and, taking his rifle from him, put it through the loop-hole. A murmur was heard among the soldiers. They began to ask him not to shoot. One of them, in a low voice, as if speaking to himself, remarked: 

	" This is provocation." 

	The Colonel, crimson with fury, turned to him for a moment and shouted : 

	" Silence! " 

	All grew silent and pressed to the loop-hole. A shot was heard, and the German officer convulsively stretched himself out and was still; blood was running from his head. The haggling soldiers scattered. 

	The Colonel threw the rifle down and, muttering through his teeth "Scoundrels! " strode further along the trenches. The " truce " was infringed. 


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
	The State Secretary to the Minister in Bern 

	3 June 1917 

	Secret reports show that the governments of the Entente countries continue to show great anxiety about Russia. The spread of the idea of peace has not been stopped even by the latest — and only temporary — consolidation of the provisional government. The despairing advances of the Russian troops cannot dissimulate the growing disorganization and unwillingness to fight of the Russian army. Lenin's peace propaganda is growing steadily stronger, and his newspaper Pravda already prints 300,000 copies.
	

https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/mar/15.htm
	V. I.   Lenin
	To Our Comrades in War-Prisoner Camps

	Comrades, a revolution has taken place in Russia.

	The Petrograd and Moscow workers were again in the vanguard of the great freedom movement. They staged a political strike. They demonstrated in the streets under the Red Flag. They fought like lions against the tsarist police, gendarmerie and the small section of the army that did not immediately side with the people. More than 2,000 were killed and wounded in Petrograd alone. The Russian workers bought our country’s freedom at the price of their blood.

	The workers’ demands were: bread, freedom, peace.

	Bread—because, as in nearly every other country involved in this robber war, the Russian people are suffering from hunger.

	Freedom—because the tsarist government, taking advantage of the war, finally turned the whole of Russia into one big prison.

	Peace—because the Russian workers, like class-conscious workers in all other countries, do not want to go on dying for the interests of a handful of the rich, do not want to continue this criminal war, started by crowned and uncrowned freebooters.

	The insurgent workers were joined by most of the men of the Petrograd and Moscow garrisons. The workers and peasants in soldier’s uniform extended a hand of brother hood to the workers and peasants not in uniform. The honest-minded part of the officer corps joined the revolution. Officers who tried to go against the people were shot down by the soldiers. 


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
	The Sergeant-Major was preparing to leave. The Lieutenant stopped him. 

	" Matters are bad, Petrovitch. They do not trust us." 

	" God alone knows whom they trust; only last week the Sixth Company elected their Sergeant-Major themselves, and now they are making a mock of him; they won't let him say a word." 

	" What will things be afterwards? " 

	The Sergeant-Major blushed, and said softly : 

	Then the Soloveytchicks will rule over us, and we shall be, so to speak, dumb animals before them — that is how matters will be, your honour." 




	
https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
	The Russian turmoil; memoirs: military, social, and political
	by Denikin, Anton Ivanovich

	Someone or other swears. 

	"Don't you wish for peace. They make peace, then we shall die here, without getting our freedom!" 

	Along the trenches came Lieutenant Albov, the Company Commander. He said to the groups of soldiers, somewhat irresolutely and entreatingly: 

	"Comrades, get to work quickly. In three days we have not made a single communication trench to the firing line." 

	The card players did not even look round; someone said in a low voice, " All right." The man reading the newspaper rose and reported, in a free and easy manner : 

	" The Company does not want to dig, because that would be preparation for an advance, and the Committee has resolved. . . 

	" Look here, you understand nothing at all about it, and, moreover, why do you speak for the whole Company ? Even if we remain on the defensive we are lost in case of an alarm; the whole Company cannot get out to the firing line along a single trench." 

	He said this, and with a gesture of despair went on his way. Matters were hopeless. Every time he tried to speak with them for a time, and in a friendly way, they would listen to him atten- tively; they liked to talk to him, and, on the whole, his Company looked on him favourably in their own way. But he felt that between him and them a wall had sprung up, against which all his good impulses were shattered. He had lost the path to their soul — lost it in the impassable jungle of darkness, roughness, and that wave of distrust and suspicion which had overwhelmed the soldiers. Was it, perhaps, that he used the wrong words, or was not able to say what he meant ? Scarcely that. But a little while before the War, when he was a student and was carried away by the popular movement, he had visited villages and factories and had found " real words " which were clear and comprehensible to all. But, most of all, with what words can one move men to face death when all their feelings are veiled by one feeling — that of self-preservation?

	...

	The relief came at last. Captain Bouravin, the Commander of the Fifth Company, came into the hut. Albov offered to show him the section and explain the disposition of the enemy. 

	" Very well, though that does not matter, because I am not really in command of the Company — I am boycotted." 

	" How? " 

	" Just so. They have elected the 2nd Lieutenant, my subaltern, as Company Commander, and degraded me as a supporter of the old regime, because, you see, I had drill twice a day — you know that the marching contingents come up here absolutely untrained. Indeed, the 2nd Lieutenant was the first to vote for my removal. ' We have been slave-driven long enough/ said he. ' Now we are free. We must clean out everyone, beginning with the head. A young man can manage the regiment just as well, so long as he is a true Democrat and supports the freedom of the soldier.' I would have left, but the Colonel flatly refused to allow it, and forbids me to hand over the company. So now, you see, we have two commanders. I have stood the situation for five days.


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/apr/x02.htm#s12
	12) SHOULD OFFICERS BE ELECTED BY THE SOLDIERS?

		A. (to the right oi the C.D.) and B. (C.D.). No. That would be detrimental to the landowners and capitalists. If the soldiers cannot be pacified otherwise, they must be temporarily promised this reform, but it must be withdrawn at the earliest possible moment.

		C. (S.D. and S.R.). Yes, they should.

		D. (“Bolsheviks”). Not only must they be elected, but every step of every officer and general must be supervised by persons specially elected for the purpose by the soldiers. 

	13) IS IT DESIRABLE FOR THE SOLDIERS, ON THEIR OWN DECISION, TO DISPLACE THEIR SUPERIORS?

		A. (to the right of the C.D.) and B. (C.D.). It is distinctly harmful. Guchkov has already forbidden it. He has already threatened to use force. Guchkov must be supported.

		C. (S.D. and S.R.). It is. But it is not clear whether they should be replaced before the matter is taken up with the Contact Commission, or vice versa.

		D. (“Bolsheviks”). It is desirable and essential in every way. The soldiers will obey and respect only elected authorities. 


https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
	Look here, Albov, you are not in a hurry, are you? Very good, then ; let us have a chat. I am feeling depressed. Albov, have you not yet thought of suicide? " 

	" Not as yet." 


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/jun/03.htm
	V. I. Lenin
	Bolshevism and “Demoralisation” of the Army

	...They need a pretext for saying: “The Bolsheviks are demoralising the army” and then shutting the Bolsheviks’ mouths.

	To dispose once for all of “enemy” slander and the ridiculous distortions of Bolshevism, we quote the concluding part of a leaflet distributed in the army by one of our delegates on the eve of the All-Russia Congress.

	Here it is: 

    	“Comrades, you must have your say.

    	“Do not let us have any agreements with the bourgeoisie?

    	“All power to the Soviet of Workers’ and Soldiers’ Deputies! 

    	...“Comrades! Only by the transfer of power to the democracy in Russia, Germany, and France, only by the overthrow of the bourgeois governments in all countries, can the war be ended. 

    	“Our revolution lies started this, and it is our task now to give a further impetus to the world revolution by having a fully authorised popular Russian government make an order of peace to all the governments of Europe and by strengthening our alliance with the revolutionary democrats of Western Europe. 

    	“Woe betide the bourgeois government that will persist in continuing the war after this.

		“Together with Its people we shall make revolutionary war upon that government. 


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1915/jul/26.htm
	V. I. Lenin
	The Defeat of One’s Own Government in the Imperialist War

	During a reactionary war a revolutionary class cannot but desire the defeat of its government.

	This is axiomatic, and disputed only by conscious partisans or helpless satellites of the social-chauvinists. Among the former, for instance, is Semkovsky of the Organising Committee (No. 2 of its Izvestia), and among the latter, Trotsky and Bukvoyed,[2] and Kautsky in Germany. To desire Russia’s defeat, Trotsky writes, is “an uncalled-for and absolutely unjustifiable concession to the political methodology of social-patriotism, which would replace the revolutionary struggle against the war and the conditions causing it, with an orientation—highly arbitrary in the present conditions—towards the lesser evil” (Nashe Slovo No. 105).

	This is an instance of high-flown phraseology with which Trotsky always justifies opportunism. A “revolutionary struggle against the war” is merely an empty and meaning less exclamation, something at which the heroes of the Second International excel, *unless* it means revolutionary action against *one’s own government* even in wartime. One has only to do some thinking in order to understand this. Wartime revolutionary action against one’s own government indubitably means, not only desiring its defeat, but really facilitating such a defeat.

	...A revolution in wartime means civil war; the *conversion* of a war between governments into a civil war is, on the one hand, facilitated by military reverses ("defeats") of governments; on the other hand, one cannot actually strive for such a conversion without thereby facilitating defeat. 

	...Anyone who would in all earnest refute the “slogan” of defeat for one’s own government in the imperialist war should prove one of three things: (1) that the war of 1914-15 is not reactionary, or (2) that a revolution stemming from that war is impossible, or (3) that co-ordination and mutual aid are possible between revolutionary movements in all the   belligerent countries. The third point is particularly important to Russia, a most backward country, where an immediate socialist revolution is impossible.


https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
	Bouravin rose to his feet. 

	" Understand me, they have desecrated my soul, outraged my human dignity, and so every day, every hour, in every word, glance or gesture one sees a constant outrage. What have I done to them ? I have been in the service for eight years ; I have no family, no house or home. All this I have found in the regiment, my own regiment. Twice I have been badly wounded, and before my wounds were healed have rushed back to the regiment — so there you are ! And I loved the soldier— I am ashamed to speak of it myself, but they must remember how, more than once, I have crept out under the barbed wire to drag in the wounded. And now ! Well, yes, I reverence the regimental flag and hate their crimson rags. I accept the Revolution. But to me Russia is infinitely dearer than the Revolution. All these Committees and meetings, all this adventitious rubbish which has been sown in the Army I am organically unable to swallow and digest. But, after all, I interfere with no one; I say nothing of this to anyone, I strive to convince no one. If only the War could be ended honourably, and then I am ready to break stones on the highway, only not to remain in an Army democratised in such a manner."



https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
	"In spite of its enormous numerical and technical superiority, the 11th Army was retreating uninterruptedly. On the 8th of July it had already reached the Serenth, never halting at the very strong fortified position to the West of the river, which had been our starting point in the glorious advance of 1916. Bohm- Ermolli had detached some of his forces for the pursuit of the Russian troops in the direction of Tarnapol and had moved his main forces southwards between the Serenth and the Strypa, threatening to cut off the communication of the 7th Army, to throw them into the Dniester and, perhaps, cut off the retreat of the 8th Army. On July 9th the Austro-Germans had aready reached Mikulinze, a distance of one march south of Tarnapol.

	...On July 10th the Austro-Germans advanced to the line Mikulinze-Podgaitze-Stanilavov. On the 11th the Germans occupied Tarnapol, abandoned without fighting by the 1st Guards Army Corps. On the next day they broke through our position on the rivers Gniezno and Sereth, South of Trembovlia, and developed their advance in the Eastern and South-Eastern direc- tions. On the same day, pursuing the 7th and 8th Armies, the enemy occupied the line from the Sereth to Monsaterjisko- Tlumatch.

	On the 12th July, seeing that the position was desperate, the Commander-in-Chief issued orders for a retreat from the Sereth, and by the 21st the Armies of the South-Western Front, having cleared Galicia and Bukovina, reached the Russian frontier. Their retreat was marked by fires, violence, murders and plunder. A few units, however, fought the enemy stubbornly and covered the retreat of the maddened mob of deserters by sacrificing their lives. Among them were Russian officers, whose bodies covered the battlefields. The Armies were retreating in disorder; the same Armies that, only a year ago, had captured Lutsk, Brody-Stanis- lavov, Chernovetz in their triumphal progress . . . were retreating before the same Austro-German troops that only a year ago had been completely defeated and had strewn with fugitives the plains of Volynia, Galicia and Bukovina, leaving hundreds of thousands of prisoners in our hands.


https://weaponsandwarfare.com/2016/02/25/the-battle-of-riga-september-1917/
	The Battle of Riga -September 1917

	At the Moscow Conference General Korniloff had uttered grave warning to the effect that if the Russian army did not help him to hold the shore of the Gulf of Riga, the road to Petrograd would be opened wide. Whilst he was speaking, the Germans were preparing their attack. Great naval activity started in the Gulf of Riga on September 1st. On the same day, after a strong artillery preparation, the German land forces crossed the River Dvina in the region of Uxkull, south-east of Riga, occupied Kupfer-Mammer, and developed their success in a northerly direction. The next day the enemy assumed the offensive in the region of the Mitau road. Towards the evening they succeeded in penetrating the Russian positions on the river Jagel, in the region of Melmager-Skripto. Some Russian detachments left their position and retired to the north. This caused a general order to be given to abandon the Riga region, and the Germans were left in possession. The city was evacuated on Monday, September 3rd, after it had been shelled by the Germans for a few hours.

	Later details of the fall indicated that although some Russian detachments had fled before the oncoming enemy, others of the Russian troops behaved with great gallantry. They fought well, but were finally compelled to retreat owing to the superior numbers of the enemy’s forces, and his preponderance in artillery. The Petrograd reports mentioned that the fortifications and bridges of the town were blown up before the retirement.


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/aug/22.htm
	V. I. Lenin

	Letter Over the Publication of “Leaflet on the Capture of Riga”

	Written after August 22 (September 4), 1917

	This leaflet cannot, of course, be published legally, but everything must be done to have it published illegally.

	... I am aware that the sluggishness of our Bolsheviks is   great and that it will take a great deal of effort to secure the publication of illegal leaflets. But I shall go on insisting because those are the demands of life, the demands of the movement.

	We must issue illegally free leaflets and handbills which are not curtailed and which speak out at the top of their voice. They should be signed: “A group of persecuted Bolsheviks”.

		Workers, soldiers and all working people!

		The enemy troops have taken Riga. We have suffered another heavy defeat. The incredible calamities inflicted on the people by the war are being aggravated and dragged out.

		Why is the war being dragged out? The reason is still a division of the spoils between the capitalist brigands ...The Kerensky government, with the participation and support of the Mensheviks and the S.R.s, has been brazenly cheating the people, lulling them with empty talk about their desire for peace, talk which is not binding in any way, while actually dragging out the predatory war

		...Tens and hundreds of thousands of people have died in the offensive, which the Kerensky, Menshevik, and S.R. government started in June. Tens and hundreds of thousands will die in the protracted war, so long as the people continue to tolerate such a government.

		Only a workers’ government can save the country. It alone will not cheat the people, but will immediately offer to all countries precise, clear-cut and fair peace terms.

		The bourgeoisie has been trying to intimidate the people and create a panic, in an effort to get the ignorant people to believe that peace cannot be offered right away, as this would mean “losing Riga” and so on. That is cheating the people.


https://weaponsandwarfare.com/2016/02/25/the-battle-of-riga-september-1917/
	Once in possession of the town, German submarines entered the Gulf of Riga, and commenced shelling the villages along the shore. Meanwhile the Russian army fell back north, and was followed by a rapid advance of the Germans.


https://books.google.com/books?id=I1LtBAAAQBAJ&pg=PT125
	THE FALL OF RIGA

	...On 1 September, 1917, German artillery fired more than 20,000 shells, most of them gas shells, without warning. The attack struck Russian defenders like a bolt of lightning, catching them completely unprepared. German stormtroops soon began to cross the rivers and streams around Riga in specially designed boats, establishing bridgeheads and directing the fire of more conventional artillery to prevent Russia counterattacks.

	...the Germans were able to land nine divisions of troops across the Dvina River in just 48 hours. Once they did so, the Russian defenders knew the battle was lost and made quick plans to evacuate a now indefensible Riga. Setting some buildings on fire to, the Russians evacuated as many men and supplies as they could amid scenes of chaos and sheer panic. German artillery pounded the city and many of the bridges leading east in the hopes of capturing as many Russian soldiers as possible. By the third day of the operation, German forces had entered parts of Riga, and by day four they had complete control of the city and its port.

	...The Germans estimated their casualities at 4200 and Russian casualties more than 25,000. The Russians also lost 250 of their precious artillery peices, leaving five Russian divisions without significant artillery support. Many smaller Russian units simply meleted away in the face of the attack, underscoring the essential morale problems of the army. The Russian officer crops tried everything it could think of to stem the tide of desertion. Commanders ordered deserters shot on sight, tried to create their own stormtroop detachements and even formed a special all-female battalion. The Russian soldier, however, had begun to give up the cause.



------


https://encyclopedia.1914-1918-online.net/article/eastern_front
	On 19 July, the Germans counter-attacked toward Tarnopol; the Russian formations opposing them simply vanished. The Central Powers advanced twelve kilometers on the first day of the offensive and captured Tarnopol on 25 July. By early August, the Russians had evacuated both Galicia and the Bukovina, surrendering all of the gains of 1916. In the chaotic flight to the rear, soldiers shot their officers and simply began walking home. For all intents and purposes, Russia disposed of no organized military force south of the Pripet Marshes. The counter-offensive nonetheless ground to a halt at the Galician border. Austria-Hungary had no further reserves to dedicate to the attack, and the Germans needed every available man on the Western Front. For the moment, Russia was spared.

	Ludendorff, however, was determined to drive Russia from the war and free up some of the eighty German battalions that remained on the Eastern Front. Shifting his artillery north, Ludendorff ordered an attack on Riga; if that city fell, he reasoned, the road to Petrograd would be open and Russia would be forced to conclude peace. 


http://www.bbc.co.uk/history/worldwars/wwone/eastern_front_01.shtml
	Anarchist and Bolshevik agitators played their own part in destroying the Russian Army's ability to fight. Many anti-war radicals, along with the Bolshevik leader, Vladimir Lenin, were ferried home from exile in Switzerland in April 1917, courtesy of the German General Staff (which had spent roughly 30 million marks trying to foment disorder in Russia by the end of 1917).

	The summer offensive was a disaster. Peasant soldiers deserted en masse to join the revolution, and fraternisation with the enemy became common. Meanwhile, in an attempt to restore order and resist the German counter-offensive, most of the generals and forces of the political right threw their weight behind a plan for a military coup, under the Russian Army's commander-in-chief, General Kornilov.

	...The only winners were the Bolsheviks, with Lenin at their head, who were able to topple Kerensky and take power in the October Revolution of 1917- without significant resistance from either the government or the army.


https://books.google.com/books?id=V3IeAQAAMAAJ&pg=PA418&lpg=PA418
	New Lights on the Russian Revolution

	June 14, 1919

	...Mr. Spargo traces the intricate history of the Russian revolutionary parties and shows how the Socialists in 1902 slit in two, the majojrity (Bolsheveki) following Lenin, and the minority (Mensheviki) following Plechanov. At first the Bolsheviki were nurst by the Czar, later by the Kaiser.

	...The charge that the Bolshevik movement was secretly encouraged by the Russian Government before the war is confirmed by Serge Persky in the latest volume of his journalistic articles, From Nicholas II to Lenin. He has a photograph of notes of a speech delivered by Malinovsky in the Duma which had been OK'd and annotated by the Minister Maarof. Pravda ("Truth"), the official organ of the Bolshevists, was subsidzed by the Okhrana (secret politce), and Lenin himself in 1910 or 1911 had relations with them. When this was exposed Lenin defended himself in the same fashion as when charged with receiving German aid:

		It was not the Okhrana that made use of us but on the contrary we that made use of the Okhrana. Without doubt the Okhrana has rendered great services to our party without ever obtaining anything from us.


------


The idea of using war to futher their ends didn't die with Lenin:


http://articles.latimes.com/2004/feb/22/books/bk-khrush22/
	A tangled conspiracy tale, Soviet style

	..."Stalin's Last Crime" makes such an effort to unmask him. But what distinguishes it from the rest is the way in which the authors combine crime-story narrative techniques with unprecedented, previously unknown documents from recently opened KGB archives to produce their account. Their book suggests that Stalin had a plan for worldwide chaos, starting by fabricating a Jewish conspiracy and ending in nuclear war. Even more startling, the authors suggest that this plan was foiled by one of Stalin's own men, who killed the leader.

	...Jonathan Brent, editorial director of Yale University Press, and Russian historian Vladimir P. Naumov seek to untangle what happened to Stalin's "final masterpiece of deception," the Jewish Doctors' Plot of 1953. Threatening to create purges across Soviet society to rival those in the 1930s, the plot alleged that a conspiracy existed among Jewish doctors to kill high-ranking KGB officers.

	...The Jewish Antifascist Committee and its president, the famous Soviet Jewish actor Solomon Mikhoels, was also named part of the conspiracy, and there was a rumored plot to destroy the Kremlin called "The Plan of the Internal Blow." That plan revolved around the case of I.I. Varfolomeev, an alleged "spy who had worked for the Japanese prior to the Great Patriotic War [World War II] and for the Americans beginning in 1948."

	Five nuclear devices were to be fired from the windows of the U.S. Embassy (then on Red Square) at the Kremlin: The whole Soviet central government "would go up in smoke, as would most of Moscow." Here, Stalin's paranoia moves from the world of Beckett to Eugene Ionesco and to the theater of the absurd.

	The book pays great attention to details, explaining through documents and analysis that "Timashuk's letter had nothing to do with inaugurating the plot. It had everything to do, after the fact, with helping to establish the existence of the conspiratorial group," because "underlying Stalin's strategy was the deeply rooted principle, inherited from Lenin, that enemies were more useful to Soviet power than friends."

	"Stalin," the authors add, "wasn't simply paranoid. He didn't see enemies everywhere -- he invented them because he needed them."


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	As in other NATO countries, the chief priority of intelligence collection in the FRG during the early 1980s was operation RYAN—the fruitless attempt to discover ... Western preparations for a nuclear first strike against the Soviet Union.

	...For several years Moscow succumbed to what its ambassador in Washington, Anatoli Dobrynin, fairly described as a “paranoid interpretation” of Reagan’s policy. Most residencies in Western capitals were less alarmist than Andropov and the KGB leadership. When Oleg Antonovich Gordievsky joined the London residency in June 1982 he found all his colleagues in Line PR skeptical about operation RYAN. None, however, were willing to risk their careers by challenging the Centre’s assessment. RYAN thus created a vicious circle of intelligence collection and assessment. Residencies were, in effect, ordered to search out alarming information. The Centre was duly alarmed by what they supplied and demanded more. The Washington resident, Stanislav Andreyevich Androsov, a protégé of Kryuchkov, was at pains to provide it. 

	The Centre interpreted the announcement of the SDI (“Star Wars”) program in March 1983 as part of the psychological preparation of the American people for nuclear war. On September 28, 1983 the terminally ill Andropov issued from his sickbed a denunciation of American policy couched in apocalyptic language unparalleled since the depths of the Cold War. “Outrageous military psychosis” had taken over the United States. “The Reagan administration, in its imperial ambitions, goes so far that one begins to doubt whether Washington has any brakes at all preventing it from crossing the point at which any sober-minded person must stop.” Alarm within the Centre reached a climax during the NATO exercise “Able Archer 83,” held in November 1983 to practice nuclear release procedures. For a time the KGB leadership was haunted by the fear that the exercise might be intended as cover for a nuclear first strike. Some FCD officers stationed in the West were by now more concerned by the alarmism in the Centre than by the threat of a Western surprise attack.

	Operation RYAN wound down (though it did not end) during 1984, helped by the death of its two main proponents, Andropov and defense minister Ustinov, and by reassuring signals from London and Washington, both worried by intelligence on Soviet paranoia.

	...The old suspicions and conspiracy theories about the United States, however, still lurked not far below the surface of Kryuchkov’s address. Without mentioning operation RYAN by name, he sought to justify the principles on which it was based:

		Many of [the FCD’s] former responsibilities have not been removed from the agenda. The principal one of these is not to overlook the immediate danger of nuclear conflict being unleashed.

	And he added a warning about what he alleged was the continuing brutality of “provocation operations” by Western intelligence services; he claimed that there had been over 900 such operations during the first half of 1988 alone. 


http://articles.latimes.com/2004/feb/22/books/bk-khrush22/
	A tangled conspiracy tale, Soviet style

	..."It was not by accident that the medical and the political sides of the plot were expanding in the same way toward greater and greater inclusiveness," the authors assert. "The plotters were potentially all Jews, and all Jews were potential enemies of the state."


https://archive.org/details/TheWorldWasGoingOurWayTheKGBAndTheBattleForTheTheThirdWorld
	...With its habitual tendency to conspiracy theory, never more marked than in its attitude to Zionism and the Jewish lobby in the United States, the Centre interpreted Sadat’s visit less as a piece of theatre than as a deep-laid plot. Sadat, it believed, had arranged the trip with the Americans...

	...Remarkably, Avni’s enthusiasm for the Soviet Union survived even the paranoia of the ‘Jewish doctors’ plot’. He later told his interrogator that Stalin had been a ‘genius’ and initially refused to believe that Khrushchev’s ‘Secret Speech’ of 1956 denouncing Stalin was genuine.

	While in Brussels, Avni also began to be employed by Mossad, using his fluent German to pose as a German businessman and make contact with former Nazis.

	...The KGB sent a stream of reports, often signed personally by Andropov, to the Politburo and the Central Committee, reporting the resolute action taken to ‘neutralize’ even the most minor protests. Every protest was interpreted as part of an international Zionist conspiracy against the Soviet Union:

		...Zionist circles, in trying to deflect the attention of world public opinion away from the aggressive actions of the US in Indochina and of Israel in the Middle East, and toward the non-existent ‘problem’ of the Jews in the USSR, have unleashed on our country a broad campaign of slander, and to this end are organizing abroad anti- Soviet meetings, assemblies, conferences, marches and other hostile acts.

		. . . Along with the cultivation of anti-Soviet world opinion, the Zionists are striving to exert ideological influence on the Jewish population of the Soviet Union, in order to provoke negative manifestations and create a nationalist underground in our country.

 	...Andropov continued to take a close, even obsessive, personal interest in the surveillance of would-be Jewish emigrants and all contacts between Soviet Jews and their foreign supporters. He regarded even the sending of matsos (unleavened bread) from the West to Soviet Jews for the seder (the Passover meal) as an issue of such grave importance that it needed to be brought to the attention of the Politburo, writing in March 1975:

		From the experience of previous years, it is clear that the delivery of such parcels [of matsos] to the addressees gives rise to negative processes among the Jewish population of the USSR, and reinforces nationalist and pro-emigration feelings.

		In view of this, and in view of the fact that at the present time Jewish communities are fully supplied with locally baked matsos, the Committee of State Security considers it essential for parcels containing matsos sent from abroad to be confiscated . .

	The claim that Soviet Jews were already well supplied with Passover matsos was disinformation designed to pre-empt opposition to Andropov’s proposal from those Politburo members who, like Brezhnev, occasionally grasped that the obsession with Zionist conspiracy was ‘making us stupid’.

 	...the level of anti-Zionist and anti-semitic paranoia in the Centre dropped sharply after Stalin’s death in March 1953


http://articles.latimes.com/2004/feb/22/books/bk-khrush22/
	A tangled conspiracy tale, Soviet style

	...They explain that "by providing the plot with Jewish characters, Stalin could broaden the conspiracy ... to the international scene in which America and the newly formed state of Israel posed significant, if still potential, threats to Soviet power and prestige. The Jews would become the 'canal' through which American subversion flowed directly into the Soviet government, threatening to destroy it. The new menace would have both an external and an internal component."

	..."The Plan of the Internal Blow" along with the "Jewish conspiracy" of which the vozhd himself would become a target was to justify a Soviet holocaust and the possible "hot war" between the Soviet Union and the United States. This particular hypothesis, offered by Brent and Naumov, lacks consistent documented proof; however, it appears convincing and even credible precisely because...


https://apnews.com/9f77a17c001f4cf3baeb28990b0d92eb/ap-investigation-nuclear-smugglers-sought-terrorist-buyers
	AP INVESTIGATION: Nuclear black market seeks IS extremists

	...CHISINAU, Moldova (AP) — Over the pulsating beat at an exclusive nightclub, the arms smuggler made his pitch to a client: 2.5 million euros for enough radioactive cesium to contaminate several city blocks.

	It was earlier this year, and the two men were plotting their deal at an unlikely spot: the terrace of Cocos Prive, a dance club and sushi bar in Chisinau, the capital of Moldova.

	“You can make a dirty bomb, which would be perfect for the Islamic State,” the smuggler said. “If you have a connection with them, the business will go smoothly.”

	...The previously unpublicized case is one of at least four attempts in five years in which criminal networks with suspected Russian ties sought to sell radioactive material to extremists through Moldova, an investigation by The Associated Press has found. One investigation uncovered an attempt to sell bomb-grade uranium to a real buyer from the Middle East, the first known case of its kind.

	In that operation, wiretaps and interviews with investigators show, a middleman for the gang repeatedly ranted with hatred for America as he focused on smuggling the essential material for an atomic bomb and blueprints for a dirty bomb to a Middle Eastern buyer.

	...The sting operations involved a partnership between the FBI and a small group of Moldovan investigators, who over five years went from near total ignorance of the black market to wrapping up four sting operations. Informants and police posing as connected gangsters penetrated the smuggling networks, using old-fashioned undercover tactics as well as high-tech gear from radiation detectors to clothing threaded with recording devices.

	But their successes were undercut by striking shortcomings: Kingpins got away, and those arrested evaded long prison sentences, sometimes quickly returning to nuclear smuggling, AP found.

	...Several months later, a former KGB informant, Teodor Chetrus, called Malic’s source, the Moldovan businessman. Chetrus told him he had uranium to sell, but was looking for a Middle Eastern buyer.

	Unlike Malic’s first case, this one involved highly enriched uranium, the type that can be used to make a nuclear bomb.


https://archive.org/details/TheSwordAndTheShield-TheMitrokhinArchiveAndTheSecretHistoryOfTheKGB
	...In 1983, at the height of operation RYAN (the combined KGB/GRU attempt to find (nonexistent) evidence of US and NATO plans for a surprise nuclear attack), Andropov ordered preparations by Department 8 for terrorist attacks on British, American and NATO targets in Europe. Plans were made for a campaign of letter bombs to be sent to Mrs. Thatcher’s office at 10 Downing Street and to a series of prominent US and NATO representatives. At about the same time the KGB organized a series of dead drops in bars and restaurants near American bases in West Germany, intended to conceal explosives which could be detonated in a manner that would give the impression of terrorist attacks. The dead drop sites included behind a vending machine, in a ventilation cavity under a sink, on a wooden beam over a lavatory and underneath a paper-towel dispenser. By the time the sites were discovered by the CIA in 1985, however, operation RYAN was winding down and plans for a KGB terrorist campaign against NATO targets had been shelved.

	In August 1983, while RYAN was still in full swing, the Centre instructed the main residencies in European NATO countries to step up their search for NATO preparations for

		the secret infiltration of sabotage teams with nuclear, bacteriological and chemical weapons into the countries of the Warsaw Pact; [and] the expansion of the network of sabotage-training intelligence schools and increase in the recruitment of émigrés from the socialist countries and persons who know the language of these countries, and the creation of émigré military formations and sabotage and intelligence teams.

	Though, as with most of the requirements for operation RYAN, there was no such intelligence to collect, the Centre’s instructions give an important insight into Moscow’s contingency plans for the role of Department 8 and its DRGs in an attack on NATO.




------


This can be seen in the Korean war:


https://archive.org/details/TheWorldWasGoingOurWayTheKGBAndTheBattleForTheTheThirdWorld
	Kim Il Sung, though impatient to invade South Korea, did not launch his attack until Stalin gave him permission. Stalin allowed the Korean War to begin in June 1950 largely because he had misjudged US policy. Intelligence from the United States, following its failure to intervene to prevent the Communist victory in China, indicated, he believed, that ‘the prevailing mood is not to interfere’ in Korea. That erroneous conclusion seems to have been based on his misinterpretation of a US National Security Council document (probably supplied by the KGB agent Donald Maclean), which excluded the Asian mainland from the American defence perimeter. Having thus misinterpreted US policy, Stalin was prepared for the first time to allow Kim to attack the South.


https://www.wilsoncenter.org/sites/default/files/ACFAEF.pdf
	“Should We Fear This?” Stalin and the Danger of War with America

	...This danger was foremost in Stalin’s mind when Kim Il Sung first requested permission to attack the South, during the March 1949 visit to Moscow of the first official delegation from the newly-established Democratic People’s Republic of Korea (DPRK). The new sources reveal that Stalin turned down Kim’s request on the grounds that the US would regard an attack on the South as a violation of its 1945 agreement with the USSR about the division of the country at the 38 th parallel and would consequently be likely to intervene. Moreover, the Soviet leader regarded the question as not yet topical since American troops were still in Korea and the DPRK’s armed forces were not yet superior to those of the South. He did not object to the proposal in principle, however, nor did he seem surprised by it. Apparently sharing Kim’s assumption that such an operation was necessary, he regarded the issue as one of waiting for favorable circumstances.

	...The question of favorable timing for an attack on the South soon became topical, however, as reports reached Moscow of South Korean forays into DPRK territory. Erroneously assuming that the South Korean actions reflected American intentions, Stalin reached the false conclusion that the imminent withdrawal of US forces from Korea was designed to free the Southerners to invade the North—perhaps mirroring his own rationale for withdrawing Soviet troops in late 1948. In April he instructed his ambassador in Pyongyang, Terentii F. Shtykov, to assess the accuracy of intelligence reports that the Americans would soon move their troops out of South Korea to nearby Japanese islands. “The purpose of the withdrawal,” Stalin explained, “is to give freedom of action to the South Korean Army. By that time the UN Commission will also leave Korea. In April-May the Southerners will concentrate their troops near the 38th parallel. In June the Southerners will start a sudden attack on the North in order to finish the total destruction of the Northern army by August.”

	In reality, both patron and client in Seoul feared that the withdrawal of US forces would lead to the collapse of the newly established Republic of Korea, either through internal subversion or an attack from the North. It was this fear that led the US repeatedly to delay the withdrawal—from August to December 1948, then to March, May and finally June 1949. Moreover, while individuals within the South Korean government hoped to provoke an incident with the North in order to force the US to leave its troops in Korea, Washington was determined to avoid such an entanglement. As General W.L. Roberts, commander of the Korean Military Advisory Group (KMAG), bluntly put it during the border fighting in August, “the South Koreans wish to invade the North. We tell them that if such [an invasion] occurs, all [US] advisers will pull out and the ECA [Economic Cooperation Administration] spigot will be turned off.” American determination to avoid becoming embroiled in the intra-Korean conflict was clear enough to the Koreans that, as US Ambassador in Seoul John Muccio reported, they “contemplated the withdrawal of the US task force with genuine fear—even jitteriness in certain circles. They moved heaven and earth to have withdrawal deferred.”

	Despite having an extensive intelligence network in Seoul that would have known of the sharp divergence between American and South Korean intentions, Shtykov did nothing to correct his boss’ misperceptions. In his report of May 2 the ambassador noted accurately that ROK forces were being expanded with US assistance and that the government of President Syngman Rhee was taking steps to increase the combat readiness of its army, but he failed entirely to note the disparity in aims between patron and client. Instead—perhaps out of an understandable impulse toward self-protection—he merely repeated Stalin’s own conclusions, adding supporting detail.

	...After American forces withdrew from Korea in June and no invasion of the North ensued, Stalin was willing to consider a more forward strategy.

	...Stalin’s decision to consider mounting this limited offensive followed a recommendation from Shtykov a week earlier that such action was militarily advisable. The ambassador noted, however, that “the Southerners may have enough strength to counterattack, and then the fighting can take on a prolonged character.”

	...On 30 March Kim Il Sung and Pak Hon-yong traveled to Moscow for discussions with Stalin, remaining there until 25 April. In the absence of any records of these meetings, until now we have only been able to speculate about what constituted the “changed international situation” that Stalin believed made it possible to undertake the invasion and about why he insisted that the Koreans must secure Mao Zedong’s approval before the operation could proceed. The new sources illuminate these two important questions, in a report prepared by the Central Committee’s International Department summarizing the conversations Stalin had with Kim Il Sung and Pak Hon-yong during their April meetings. This summary deserves to be quoted in full:

		Comrade Stalin confirmed to Kim Il Sung that the international environment has sufficiently changed to permit a more active stance on the unification of Korea.

		Internationally, the Chinese Communist Party’s victory over the Guomindang has improved the environment for actions in Korea. China is no longer busy with internal fighting and can devote its attention and energy to the assistance of Korea. If necessary, China has at its disposal troops which can be utilized in Korea without any harm to the other needs of China. The Chinese victory is also important psychologically. It has proved the strength of Asian revolutionaries, and shown the weakness of Asian reactionaries and their mentors in the West, in America. Americans left China and did not dare to challenge the new Chinese authorities militarily. 

		Now that China has signed a treaty of alliance with the USSR, Americans will be even more hesitant to challenge the Communists in Asia. According to information coming from the United States, it is really so. The prevailing mood is not to interfere. Such a mood is reinforced by the fact that the USSR now has the atomic bomb and that our positions are solidified in Pyongyang. 

		However, we have to weigh once again all the ‘pros’ and ‘cons’ of the liberation. First of all, will Americans interfere or not? Second, the liberation can be started only if the Chinese leadership endorses it.

		Kim Il Sung expressed his opinion that Americans won’t interfere. Now that they know that the USSR and China are behind Korea and are able to help it, Americans will not risk a big war. As for Comrade Mao Zedong, he always supported our desire to liberate the whole country. Comrade Mao Zedong said on a number of occasions that after the Chinese revolution is completed, China will help us, if necessary, it will provide troops. However, we want to rely on our own forces to unify Korea. We believe that we can do it. 

		Comrade Stalin emphasized that a thorough preparation for war was a must. First of all, armed forces have to be elevated to an upper level of preparedness. You have to form elite attack divisions as well as create additional units. Divisions have to have more weapons, more mechanized means of movement and combat. Your request in this respect will be fully satisfied. 

		Then a detailed plan of the offensive must be drawn. Basically it has to have three stages. 1. Troops are concentrated in the designated areas, close to the 38th parallel. 2. The highest bodies of power in North Korea make fresh proposals for peaceful unification. These will certainly be rejected by the other side. Then, after they are rejected, a counterattack must take place. I agree with your idea to engage the adversary in the Ongjin peninsula as it will help to disguise who initiated the combat activities. After you attack and the South counterattacks it would give you a chance to enlarge the front. The war should be quick and speedy. Southerners and Americans should not have time to come to their senses. They won’t have time to put up a strong resistance and to mobilize international support. 

	...Nowhere has Stalin’s reasoning about the war been expressed more clearly. The key factor continued to be whether the attack would prompt the United States to intervene and thus possibly drag the USSR into direct conflict with its far more powerful adversary. That the Americans had not used force to prevent a communist victory in China suggested to Stalin that they would not intervene to forestall a similar outcome in Korea, as did Soviet acquisition of nuclear weapons. Most important, however, was the “information coming from the United States” indicating that “the prevailing mood is not to interfere.” While we cannot be certain what information Stalin was referring to, the reference appears to have been to the strategic policy for the Far East adopted in late December 1949, titled NSC-48, which drew the US defense perimeter to the west of Japan and the Philippines, excluding the Asian mainland. The timing of the adoption of this new policy suggests that knowledge of NSC-48, which Stalin was in a position to obtain through his British spy in Washington, Donald McLean, convinced the Soviet leader that it was now possible to support a North Korean attack on South Korea.

	...Despite the new American strategic policy, Stalin nonetheless remained worried that military action on the Korean peninsula might prompt the US to intervene. He therefore made it clear to Kim Il Sung that the Soviet Union would under no circumstances send its troops to his assistance.

	...Mao then warned his eager Korean ally that the presence of Japanese troops might prolong the war, and that it was, in any case, “not so much the Japanese, as the Americans themselves who could interfere in the war[sic.].” Kim deflected this implied criticism by repeating Stalin’s judgment that the Americans do not show any inclination to engage themselves militarily in the Far East. They left China without fighting; the same approach can be expected in Korea.

	...Meanwhile, throughout the spring of 1950, signs multiplied indicating increasing American commitment to South Korea and to resisting communist expansion worldwide—NSC-68, a $100 million economic and military aid package for South Korea approved by Congress in March, and visits by high-ranking American officials to Seoul.27Nonetheless, despite Stalin’s continued nervousness about the risks involved, preparations for the campaign against South Korea proceeded rapidly after Kim and Pak’s return from Beijing.


	...As the invasion date drew near, Stalin continued to be concerned about the possibility of American intervention. Although he approved Shtykov’s request on June 20 to allow the KPA to use Soviet ships—presumably from Vladivostok or Port Arthur—for amphibious landings, he refused to allow Soviet personnel on the ships “because it may give the adversary a pretext for interference by the USA.”


	...Stalin replied the same day that he agreed “with Kim Il Sung’s idea for an immediate advance along the whole front line.” While this decision may have been sensible from a strictly military point of view, it reflected a disastrous misapprehension of how a World War II-style invasion across the South Korean border would be perceived in the West. Since Stalin had shared with his Western counterparts the trauma of a sudden, massive German attack, his failure to foresee the forebodings such an attack in Korea would immediately evoke in the minds of many of the world’s political leaders is all the more striking.


	...In late August, with American forces unable to break out of the Pusan perimeter, Stalin informed the North Korean leader that the Central Committee “salutes Comrade Kim Il Sung and his friends for the great liberation struggle of the Korean people, which comrade Kim Il Sung is conducting with brilliant success. The CC VKP (b) has no doubt that in the nearest future the interventionists will be driven out of Korea with ignominy.” Stalin also reassured Kim that he “should not be embarrassed” by setbacks in the war against the interventionists. 

		In such a war continuous successes do not occur. The Russians also did not have continuous successes during the Civil War, and even less so during the war with Germany. The greatest success of the Korean people is that Korea has now become the most popular country in the world and has turned into the banner for the movement in Asia for liberation from the imperialist yoke. The armies of all enslaved peoples will now learn from the Korean People’s Army the art of bringing decisive blows to the Americans and any other imperialists. Moreover, Comrade Kim Il Sung should not forget that Korea is not alone now, that it has allies who are helping it and will continue to help it. The situation of Russians during the Anglo-Franco-American intervention in 1919 was several times worse than the situation of Korean comrades today.

	Whatever feelings of euphoria Stalin may have enjoyed at this moment, however, did not lead him to alter the formula he had established in April for the Korean operation; the Soviet Union would provide weapons, supplies and advisers but North Korea would have to rely on China if it needed outside forces.

	...Still calculating that a Chinese intervention would not embroil him in a major war with the United States, he urged Mao to send immediately at least 5-6 divisions, disguised as “Volunteers,” to the th parallel. He seems to have been surprised and irritated when Mao demurred, dismissing Beijing’s invocation of the specter of World War III as a mere pretext for inaction. He reminded Mao that “leading Chinese comrades” had repeatedly expressed their readiness to move several armies to Korea’s support if the adversary crossed the 38thparallel. He also noted pointedly that he had understood such readiness to be due to China’s interest in preventing the peninsula from being transformed into a springboard for future aggression against China by the United States or Japan.

	...The Soviet leader nonetheless conceded that the United States might still be drawn into a big war for the sake of prestige. China could thus be dragged in too, and with it the Soviet Union, “which is bound with China by the Mutual Assistance Pact. Should we fear this?” Stalin asked rhetorically.

		In my opinion, we should not, because together we will be stronger than the USA and England, while the other European capitalist states (with the exception of Germany, which is unable to provide any assistance to the United States now) do not present serious military forces. If a war is inevitable, then let it be waged now, and not in a few years when Japanese militarism will be restored as an ally of the USA and when the USA and Japan will have a ready-made bridgehead on the continent in the form of the entire Korea run by Syngman Rhee.


	...when on the following day the Chinese decided to send their troops after all


http://www3.nccu.edu.tw/~lorenzo/Hao%20Chinas%20Decision.pdf
	China's Decision to Enter the Korean War: History Revisited
	
	Thirty-seven years have passed since the Korean War ended in July 1953. The Korean War, which was one of the most dramatic events of the cold war, resulted not only in huge casualties on the two sides, but also in a deep wound in Sino-American relations which took more than two decades to heal. Vast amounts of research have been done on the war, but one important aspect - the motivation behind the decision of the People's Republic of China to enter the war - remains mysteriously masked, or at least unconvincingly explained.


https://archive.org/details/TheWorldWasGoingOurWayTheKGBAndTheBattleForTheTheThirdWorld
	Collaboration between Soviet intelligence and the Chinese Communist Party (CCP) went back to the 1920s. A police raid on the Soviet consulate at Beijing in 1927 uncovered a mass of documents on Soviet espionage in China, the involvement of the CCP and instructions to it from Moscow ‘not to shrink from any measures, even including looting and massacres’ when promoting clashes between Westerners and the local population. The arrest in 1931 of the Comintern representative in Shanghai, Jakov Rudnik (alias ‘Hilaire Noulens’), led to the capture of many more files on Soviet intelligence operations and the Communist underground. A British intelligence report concluded that the files ‘afforded a unique opportunity of seeing from the inside, and on unimpeachable documentary evidence, the working of a highly developed Communist organization of the illegal order’. Among the documents which attracted particular attention were a large number of letters from ‘the notorious Annamite Communist, Nguyen Ai Quac’, later better known as Ho Chi-Minh. But the ‘most outstanding’ document, in the view of British intelligence, was a CCP report on the killing of members of the family of an alleged Communist traitor, Ku Shun-chang, carried out under the direction of Mao Zedong’s future Prime Minister, Zhou Enlai. In 1933 Mao’s security chief, Kang Sheng, arrived in Moscow as deputy head of the Chinese delegation to the Comintern and spent the next four years learning from the example of the NKVD during its most paranoid phase.


http://citeseerx.ist.psu.edu/viewdoc/download?doi=10.1.1.425.8851&rep=rep1&type=pdf
	In March, the FBI requestioned Whittaker Chambers, a former courier for a Washington, D.C. based Soviet spy ring. ...Chambers’ main concern in coming forward was not espionage so much as these Soviet agents’ ability to influence U.S. policy to the advantage of the Kremlin.


https://www.fbi.gov/news/stories/operation-ghost-stories-inside-the-russian-spy-case
	...They identified colleagues, friends, and others who might be vulnerable targets, and it is possible they were seeking to co-opt people they encountered in the academic environment who might one day hold positions of power and influence.

	...Soviet intelligence “talent spotters” were able to recruit Cambridge University students in the 1930s—including future spy Kim Philby—who would later rise to power in the British government and become Soviet operatives


http://wunc.org/post/former-spymaster-three-decades-cia
	"...in the 1930s and 1940s when the Soviets basically riddle the FDR administration and the Manhattan Project with - now they're estimating - about 500 spies."


https://books.google.com/books?id=idnZAAAAQBAJ&pg=PA159&lpg=PA159
	Let's see how Mao obtained his evidence against Liu. 'Mao had told it (Liu's case team) he wanted a spy charge. ... A large number of other people were imprisoned and interrogated, to try to turn up evidence against him. ... Shi Zhe, who had interpreted for Liu with Stalin ... was pressed to say that Liu was a Russian spy. ...'

&nbsp;

journal-dl.com/downloadpdf/591088493fbb6e13743fe44b
	Mao's China and the Sino-Soviet Split
	Mingjiang Li

	...Mao and his supporters at the conference repeatedly pressed Peng to confess a connection with the Soviets. Peng categorically denied that there was any international background to his complaints about the Great Leap Forward. But Mao and his followers – including Liu Shaoqi, Mao’s designated successor, who would later be labeled “China’s Khrushchev” – concluded that Peng served as a “Soviet agent.” 


&nbsp;


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Peng_Dehuai
	The Eighth Plenum of the Eighth CCP Central Committee was held in the scenic resort town of Lushan, Jiangxi, on July 2, 1959, to discuss Party members' positions on the Great Leap Forward. 

	...Peng participated in group meetings in the early portion of the conference, gaining consensus among his peers for criticizing the widespread practice of inaccurately reporting agricultural statistics, and emphasizing that "everybody had a share of responsibility, including Comrade Mao Zedong". Peng bluntly criticized the hesitation of senior Party members to disagree with the Party leadership, implying that many Party leaders were cowardly for following orders that they knew were not in the best interests of the Chinese people. After gaining the consensus of several of his peers, Peng developed his opinions more systematically, but was hesitant to bring up the full range of his criticisms in public. Peng discussed his thoughts with several other senior Party leaders, ...and Peng's colleagues encouraged Peng to visit Mao privately in order to win Mao's support for a reversal of the policies of the Great Leap Forward. Peng visited Mao's quarters on the night of July 13, but found Mao asleep, and wrote Mao a "letter of opinion" articulating Peng's ideas instead. Peng delivered the letter to Mao on the morning of July 14, but Mao did not read the letter until July 17. Later on July 17 Mao had Peng's letter widely circulated among the other delegates at the conference. Peng did not intend his letter to be widely read and attempted to prevent its circulation, but was not successful.

	...Peng blamed the problems of the Great Leap on what he called "problems in our way of thinking and style of work", especially the tendency for Party administrators to submit exaggerated production reports, and for Party bureaucrats to accept these figures uncritically.


https://books.google.com/books?id=-NJpAwAAQBAJ&pg=PA79&lpg=PA79
	The chairman, sensing that Peng's letter might pose a serious threat to both his continuous revolution programs and his position as China's indisputable leader, responded fiercely. he claimed that Peng had long been a careerist and that his "total negation" of the Great Leap aimed to overturn the party's top leadership. Using his authority and power, the chairman converted the Lushan conference into a denunciation of Peng's anti-party plot" Peng, in turn, lost his position as China's defense minister.

	...It is notable that when Peng Dehuai became the main target of criticism and denunciation during and after this conference, many CCP leaders connected the defense minister's letter to his visit to the Soviet Union and his meetings with Khrushchev. Those who supported Mao asked repeatedly whether Peng's "intentional attack" against Mao and the party had an "international background," that is, the support of the Soviets.


https://books.google.com/books?id=IXKkCXDvYFYC&pg=PA381&lpg=PA381
	The Jiangxi Killing Fields

	...the campaign against counter-revolutionaries began in the spring of 1930.

	...Mao further sent investigators to the 20th army, which was also a recently formed local Jiangxi force. Its leaders mutinied and took some of Mao's henchmen prisoner. They then circulated a document by Mao, now said to be forged, which suggested ... Mao aimed to get rid of and even execute Zhu De and Peng Dehuai. This ploy, if that is what it was, to induce Zhu and Peng to rebel against Mao, failed. ...Peng accepted their suggestion that they letter was a forgery and declared that he would continue to support Mao's Front Committee.


https://books.google.com/books?id=-NJpAwAAQBAJ&pg=PA79&lpg=PA79
	...Although Peng categorically denied any such connections, Mao and other party leaders, including Liu Shaoqi--who himself would later be labeled "China's Khrushchev"--persistently claimed that at Lushan, Peng acted as a "Soviet agent."


https://www.britannica.com/biography/Liu-Shaoqi
	...Liu headed the Sino-Soviet Friendship Association in 1949–54...


http://www.nytimes.com/2012/12/09/books/review/tombstone-the-great-chinese-famine-1958-1962-by-yang-jisheng.html
	In the summer of 1962, China’s president, Liu Shaoqi, warned Mao Zedong that “history will record the role you and I played in the starvation of so many people, and the cannibalism will also be memorialized!”


https://www.newyorker.com/magazine/2012/12/10/the-hungry-years
	As Pantsov and Levine point out, “Mao had no concrete plans for the Great Leap Forward.” All he did was repeat the incantation “We can catch up with England in fifteen years.” In fact, as Yang Jisheng’s “Tombstone” shows, neither experts nor the Central Committee discussed “Mao’s grand plan.” The Chinese President and Mao cultist Liu Shaoqi endorsed it, and a boastful fantasy became, as Yang writes, “the guiding ideology of the party and the country.”

	A hundred absurd schemes, such as close planting of seeds for better yields, now flowered, as loudspeakers boomed out the song “We Will Overtake England and Catch Up to America.” Mao constantly looked for ways to productively deploy the world’s biggest national population: farmers were taken out of fields and sent to work building reservoirs and irrigation channels, digging wells, and dredging river bottoms. Yang points out that, since these projects “were undertaken with an unscientific approach, many were a waste of manpower and resources.” But there was no dearth of sycophantic officials ready to run with Mao’s vaguest commands, among them Liu Shaoqi. Visiting a commune in 1958, Liu swallowed the claims by local officials that irrigating yam fields with dog-meat broth increased agricultural output. “You should start raising dogs, then,” he told them. “Dogs are very easy to breed.” Liu also became an instant expert on close planting, suggesting that peasants use tweezers for weeding the seedlings.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Peng_Dehuai
	...Mao purged most of Peng's supporters from important offices following the conference, almost completely isolating Peng politically for the rest of his life. Peng later reflected that he was confused that Mao could have interpreted his private letter as a political attack, and wondered why, after thirty years of working together, Mao could not have discussed the matter privately with him, if Peng had indeed made the mistakes Mao claimed he did.


&nbsp;


journal-dl.com/downloadpdf/591088493fbb6e13743fe44b
	Mao's China and the Sino-Soviet Split
	Mingjiang Li

	...Mao’s accusation that Peng was a Soviet agent, while completely untrue, had a logical basis. The Great Leap Forward diverged greatly from the Soviet model of socio-economic development...


&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books?id=eswo_SMNwzAC&pg=PA49
	Even though the CCP did not issue any policy statement on Lysenkoism until 1952, Lysenkoism's quest for monopoly and the status of orthodoxy had already been achieved, de facto, with the license and encouragement afford by the CCP's comprehensive pro-Soviet policy of "learning from the advanced experience of the Soviet Union." 
 

 https://books.google.com/books?id=eswo_SMNwzAC&pg=PA49
	As early as October 1949, Lysenko's representatives were in China, helping Luo Tianyu's campaign. First came V.N Stoletov, Minister of Higher Education and Chair of the Department of Genetics at Moscow University. He lectured at Luo's University, and was soon followed by other Lysenkoist luminaries, such as N. I. Nuzhdin and A. P. Ivanov. These visiting experts traveled extensively throughout China, giving introductory lectures which were rapidly transformed into college textbooks in the Chinese language. The Russians also preached to key scientists about Lysenkoism's scientific validity and effectiveness.


https://books.google.com/books?id=5vgBaLfd9XsC&pg=PA170
	Lysenkoism did not multiply China's harvests, it destroyed them. At the very time when a bewildered peasantry were struggling to come to terms with the disruption of collectivisation, they were made victims of an imposed pseudo-science that caused their crops to wither in the field.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Great_Chinese_Famine
	...Unofficial estimates vary, but scholars have estimated the number of famine victims to be between 20 and 43 million. 


&nbsp;


journal-dl.com/downloadpdf/591088493fbb6e13743fe44b
	Mao's China and the Sino-Soviet Split
	Mingjiang Li

	...The Cultural Revolution radicals not only framed the Soviet Union as negatively as possible, but also tried to fabricate and exaggerate their opponents’ foreign policy errors. Almost all the CCP leaders who were purged during the Cultural Revolution were accused of some sort of connection to the “heinous” Soviet enemy.

	...Many other opponents of Mao, including Liu Shaoqi and Deng Xiaoping, were treated in the same manner. Even though they served as the vanguard of Mao’s crusade against Moscow in the early 1960s, they were inevitably accused of betraying Mao and colluding with Khrushchev revisionists by carrying out a “revisionist” and “counter-revolutionary” foreign policy line.


&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books?id=kL03BAAAQBAJ&pg=PA132&lpg=PA132
	Liu Shaoqi explained that if the Chinese failed to support the Vietnamese revolutionaries and allowed the enemy to remain the Chinese would meet more difficulty and trouble on their southern borders.


https://books.google.com/books?id=-NJpAwAAQBAJ&pg=PA216&lpg=PA216
	In March and April 1965, top Beijing leaders held a series of discussions about the situation in Vietnam, putting special emphasis on whether Washington would further expand the war by bringing the ground war to North Vietnam and air/ground war to China. A speech made by Deng Xiaoping at a politburo meeting of 12 April, which was also attended by Liu Shaoqi and Zhou Enlai, revealed some of Bejing's basic considerations:

		It seems that the [American] bombardment will continue. The U.S. imperialists' first step was fighting a special war. According to the Vietnamese comrades, the [American] special war has reached a new stage. Our view is that the special war has failed and the war will be expanded. The American air bombardment has penetrated into the airspace only twelve kilometers south of Hanoi, and, if the bombardment continues, it is inevitable that even Hanoi, Hai Phong, and Thai Nguyen will become the targets . . . [I]t is even possible for them, under the excuse of chasing after Vietnamese planes, to invade our airspace. . . . If this is allowed to continue, they will come to Yunnan and Guangxi. Then the war will expand to part of China, and then, to all of China.


http://nsarchive2.gwu.edu/nukevault/ebb517-Nixon-Kissinger-and-the-Madman-Strategy-during-Vietnam-War/
	Nixon, Kissinger, and the Madman Strategy during Vietnam War

	President Richard Nixon and his national security adviser Henry Kissinger believed they could compel "the other side" to back down during crises in the Middle East and Vietnam by "push[ing] so many chips into the pot" that Nixon would seem 'crazy' enough to "go much further," according to newly declassified documents published today by the National Security Archive.

	The documents include a 1972 Kissinger memorandum of conversation published today for the first time in which Kissinger explains to Defense Department official Gardner Tucker that Nixon's strategy was to make "the other side ... think we might be 'crazy' and might really go much further"


http://nsarchive2.gwu.edu/NSAEBB/NSAEBB263/
	Amidst a massive bombing campaign over North Vietnam, Henry Kissinger and Richard Nixon candidly shared their evident satisfaction at the “shock treatment” of American B 52s, according to a declassified transcript of their telephone conversation published for the first time today by the National Security Archive. “They dropped a million pounds of bombs,” Kissinger briefed Nixon. “A million pounds of bombs,” Nixon exclaimed. “Goddamn, that must have been a good strike.” The conversation, secretly recorded by both Kissinger and Nixon without the other’s knowledge, reveals that the President and his national security advisor shared a belief in 1972 that the war could still be won. “That shock treatment [is] cracking them,” Nixon declared. “I tell you the thing to do is pour it in there every place we can…just bomb the hell out of them.” Kissinger optimistically predicted that, if the South Vietnamese government didn’t collapse, the U.S. would eventually prevail: “I mean if as a country we keep our nerves, we are going to make it.”

	...In the April 15, 1972, conversation about bombing North Vietnam, Nixon recalled that bombing had failed to defeat Ho Chi Mhin’s forces in the past.

	Nixon: “Of course, you want to remember that Johnson bombed them for years and it didn’t do any good.”

	Kissinger: But Mr. President, Johnson never had a strategy; he was sort of picking away at them. He would go in with 50 planes; 20 planes; I bet you we will have had more planes over there in one day than Johnson had in a month.

	Nixon: Really?

	Kissinger: Yeah.


http://www.politico.com/story/2016/12/trump-kissinger-russia-putin-232925
	Kissinger, a longtime Putin confidant, sidles up to Trump 


&nbsp;


journal-dl.com/downloadpdf/591088493fbb6e13743fe44b
	Mao's China and the Sino-Soviet Split
	Mingjiang Li

	...Obviously, the accusations had been made up by the radicals.

	...As shown in previous chapters, Liu and other moderate leaders did have slightly different views from Mao about China’s Soviet policy at several critical junctures

	...at various critical junctures, Liu and others attempted to mitigate the radicalism in Mao’s Soviet policy and to save the Sino-Soviet alliance from complete rupture. Obviously, traces of their policy preference did not escape the attention of Mao and his radical supporters.

	...But in almost all cases, their views were intended only as suggestions for Mao.

	...But their service to Mao in fighting against Moscow created a political atmosphere in China that would regard only toughness against the Soviets as politically correct.

	...In fact, he intentionally made antagonism towards the Soviets part of the strategy for defeating his domestic political challengers.

&nbsp;


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOC_0000253617.pdf
	Central Intelligence Agency
	Intelligence Report
	The Purge of Lin Piao's "Conspiratorial Clique": A Tentative Reconstruction
 
	This Staff has received constructive comment on this study from a number of other offices of the Central Intelligence Agency, all of whom agree on the credibility of the essentials of the CCP's case against Lin, and several of whom agree in general with other findings of this study.
 
	...Lin and his proteges had concluded correctly that it was Mao's intention ultimately to purge them. To prevent this and to secure the succession, Lin's group planned a military "coup" against Mao, one which envisaged Mao's assassination if necessary.


https://books.google.com/books?id=4cRgDQAAQBAJ&pg=PA171
	In 1938 when Lin Biao went to the battle in Shanxi, he put on a Japanese uniform presented to him by his Japanese friends and was mistakenly shot by Yan Xi Shan's soldiers and got hurt in the back. He was sent to Moscow for medical treatment
 
 
https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOC_0000283487.pdf
	...in early 1938, Lin was separated from Mao for four years while he was under treatment in the USSR. Lin got on very will with the Russians


https://books.google.com/books?id=Kc5wutpAuHgC&pg=PA68
	In March 1938, a severe injury removed Lin from military duty for several years until he resumed active command in 1942. In the winter of 1939 he went to the Soviet Union for medical treatment, but his stay there is shrouded in mystery; it is not even clear where and for how long Lin stayed in the hospital. Li Tianmin believes that the purpose of Lin's stay in the Soviet Union was not just medical. Ten other military officers accompanied him, most of who stayed at the Frunze Military Academy.


https://books.google.com/books?id=no4bCgAAQBAJ&pg=PA92
	Lin Biao's commander on the ground at Siping was Li Tianyou ...in 1939 he was sent to the Soviet Union for treatment of "severe neurosis." Li stayed in Russia for around four years, undergoing medical treatment and then studying as a special student at the Frunze military academy.
 
 
http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/asia/northkorea/10740104/North-Korean-intelligence-official-tells-of-aborted-coups-and-assassination-attempts.html
	North Korean intelligence official tells of aborted coups and assassination attempts 

	...In an extraordinarily rare behind-closed-doors breifing, the official also detailed two attempted coups against the regime, following uprisings in the Korean People's Army, especially among the officers who had been trained in the former Soviet Union.

	He described how North Korean officers who had graduated from Moscow's Frunze military academy had been persuaded by Russian officials to feed intelligence back to the Kremlin.

	In one plot, a group of officers hoping to provoke a Russian intervention against the regime planned to stage a bomb attack on the Russian consulate in the North Korean city of Chongjin. In another, a north eastern army unit planned a missile strike on key targets in Pyongyang. Both plots, said Mr K, were discovered before they took place.

	Mr K's claims cannot be directly verified, but much of what he said is supported by other sources. He requested that the directorate that he worked for and his current activities in South Korea remain secret.

	Both accounts appear to be supported by circumstantial evidence. North Korea watchers have noted that in 1994, a group of officers who had studied in Russia were rounded up and imprisoned, in what became known as the "Frunze Affair".


http://ieas.berkeley.edu/gas/sjas/sjas_journal/v1_2010_Fall.pdf
	James Lin discusses the political indoctrination program implemented in officer training at the Whampoa Military Academy in China under the Kuomintang (KMT) during the 1920s. Drawing from recently opened archival sources and new scholarship, Lin shows that the indoctrination program, historically rooted in a KMT-Soviet alliance, drew not only from Nationalist leader Sun Yat-sen's Three Principles of the People, but also from Leninist thought. The incorporation of Leninist ideology, and the motivations behind grounding the Whampoa indoctrination system in ideology as opposed to loyalty to a region or a province, provoke broader historical questions on nation building in Republican China.
 
	...the Russian observers only seemed to believe that Sun's personal bodyguards were absolutely loyal to him.


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOC_0000253617.pdf
	Central Intelligence Agency
	Intelligence Report
	The Purge of Lin Piao's "Conspiratorial Clique": A Tentative Reconstruction

	...When Lin's plans for a coup were frustrated, he attempted to flee to the USSR


https://books.google.com/books?id=mhq8DAAAQBAJ&pg=PA188&lpg=PA188
	Soon after the car drove out, Ye Qun said to Lin Biao: "Li Wen-pu and Lao Yang [the driver] are loyal to the Chief." Lin kept quiet. After a while, Lin Biao asked Lin Li-guo: "How far is Irkutsk?"


&nbsp;


journal-dl.com/downloadpdf/591088493fbb6e13743fe44b
	Mao's China and the Sino-Soviet Split
	Mingjiang Li

	...The radical Maoist strategy of using the Soviet Union as an external scape-goat proved to be effective not only in terms of wiping out domestic rivals, but also in leaving a deep memory of the Soviet adversary among the Chinese people for years afterward.

&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books?id=5NsMWCHDStQC&pg=PA106
	...To this day, when ordinary people who survived the famine are asked what, in their opinion, caused mass starvation, the answer almost invariably points to the Soviet Union.

&nbsp;


journal-dl.com/downloadpdf/591088493fbb6e13743fe44b
	Mao's China and the Sino-Soviet Split
	Mingjiang Li

	...It is my hope that scholars and analysts may find this approach useful in understanding many complicated issues in today’s world, where differences among civilizations are playing a far more important role than traditional security concerns, and terrorism, very often fueled by religious and ideological extremism, has become a grave threat to individual lives and the national security of many countries.


&nbsp;


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/monkey-cage/wp/2014/10/21/kissinger-the-constructivist/
	Henry Kissinger would rank in anyone’s top 10 list of the most important realists in the history of international relations theory and practice. As national security adviser and secretary of state, and as a prolific author, he became synonymous with dexterous, amoral diplomacy and a cold-blooded pragmatism attuned only to the balance of power and the pursuit of national interest.


https://dr.ntu.edu.sg/bitstream/handle/10220/7593/WP225.pdf;sequence=1
	Rising from within : China's search for a multilateral world and its implications for Sino-U.S. relations

	Li, Mingjiang

	...Washington should be prepared to plan its China policy on this basis and Sino-U.S. relation will largely be shaped by the dynamics of contentions for power and interest...


&nbsp;


https://dr.ntu.edu.sg/bitstream/handle/10220/4552/WP165.pdf?sequence=1
	Soft power in Chinese discourse : popularity and prospect

	Li, Mingjiang

	...I argue that a grand Chinese soft power strategy is still in its embryonic phase

	...Observers of Chinese politics and international relations could hardly have failed to notice the upsurge of references to the term “soft power” in China in recent years. The popularity of this concept among Chinese political leaders, scholars, journalists and pundits has been striking.


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/chinas-spy-network-united-states-includes-25000-intelligence-officers/
	China’s Intelligence Networks in United States Include 25,000 Spies
	BY: Bill Gertz

	Beijing's spy networks in the United States include up to 25,000 Chinese intelligence officers and more than 15,000 recruited agents who have stepped up offensive spying activities since 2012, according to a Chinese dissident with close ties to Beijing's military and intelligence establishment.


&nbsp;


https://www.newyorker.com/news/news-desk/the-us-has-more-to-lose-than-russia-in-spy-expulsions
	“There are more Russian operatives, declared and undeclared, in the United States now than at any other time in the past fifteen years,” the official told me. “They’re here in large numbers, actively trying to penetrate a whole host of sectors—government, industry, and academia.”

&nbsp;


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/chinas-spy-network-united-states-includes-25000-intelligence-officers/
	China’s Intelligence Networks in United States Include 25,000 Spies
	BY: Bill Gertz

	...According to the businessman, defensive intelligence was mainly focused on learning about the United States. The operations then shifted in 2012 to "offensive" spying, he said.

	"By offensive [operations], I mean to be ready to destroy the U.S. in ways they can," Guo said.


&nbsp;


http://listverse.com/2015/08/29/10-dastardly-secret-operations-of-the-kgb/
	KGB agents sought to plan and carry out a series of attacks on America’s power systems.

	Hydroelectric dams, which generate a significant portion of the US’s energy supply, were a target. The KGB formulated an elaborate plan to destroy two large hydroelectric dams, the Hungry Horse Dam and Flathead Dam, in Montana. Taking the two dams out of commission would cripple the power supply of the state and surrounding region. The attack was to begin 3 kilometers (2 mi) down the South Fork River from Hungry Horse Dam. The KGB planned to have operatives destroy power pylons on top of a tall mountain slope, which would be difficult to get back online, indefinitely knocking out power transmission from the dam. Then, the operatives were to seize the Hungry Horse Dam’s controls and destroy them. The attacks would have knocked out the power supply to all of New York state.


https://www.rferl.org/a/european-remembrance-day-ukraine-little-known-ww2-tragedy/25083847.html
	...As Nazi troops approached the city, Moscow sent in agents from the NKVD, the predecessor of the KGB, to blow up the city's DniproHES hydroelectric dam.

	The team successfully carried out its secret mission -- which historians say was ordered by Stalin himself -- tearing a hole in the dam and temporarily cutting off part of the city from the invaders.

	But the explosion also flooded villages and settlements along the Dnieper River.

	The tidal surge killed thousands of unsuspecting civilians, as well as Red Army officers who were crossing over the river.

	Since no official death toll was released at the time, the estimated number of victims varies widely. Most historians put it at between 20,000 and 100,000, based on the number of people then living in the flooded areas.


&nbsp;


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/chinas-spy-network-united-states-includes-25000-intelligence-officers/
	China’s Intelligence Networks in United States Include 25,000 Spies
	BY: Bill Gertz

	..."In addition to that, they developed between 15,000 to 18,000 other spies, and these are not directly sent but these are developed within the United States."

	The recruited agents are not limited to Asians and Chinese-Americans but include all ethnic groups, including Hispanics, Blacks, and Caucasians.

	...China's intelligence targets included several strategic areas of the United States.

	"The first is to obtain military weapons-related technology. This is priority No. 1," Guo said.

	Second, Chinese intelligence is engaged in "buying" senior U.S. officials personally, and a third objective is buying family members of American political or business elites "with a view to getting intelligence and to make big business deals in China's favor," he said.

	A fourth priority is penetrating the American internet system and critical infrastructure by implanting malicious software.

&nbsp;

https://cyberx-labs.com/en/blog/dhsfbi-report-says-russian-cyber-units-attacked-critical-infrastructure-blackenergy/
	DHS/FBI Report Confirms Russian Cyber Units Attacked Critical Infrastructure with BlackEnergy and Other Malware


&nbsp;


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/chinas-spy-network-united-states-includes-25000-intelligence-officers/
	China’s Intelligence Networks in United States Include 25,000 Spies
	BY: Bill Gertz

	"And they have successfully penetrated all the major defense weapons suppliers of the U.S. government," Guo said, adding that "the scale of their operations is mind boggling."

	..."The United States is bleeding and is unaware that sooner or later the United States will run out of blood," Guo said.

	Also, the United States is overly reliant on technical spying while China has an asymmetrical advantage in using its tens of thousands of human spies.

	China also is working to subvert the United States by working together with rogue regimes, such as those in North Korea and Iran.


&nbsp;


http://news.bbc.co.uk/2/hi/europe/5284938.stm
	...Last week Israeli officials said they had provided Moscow with proof that Hezbollah had been supplied with Russian weapons delivered to the Syrian Army.

	Mr Ivanov said that it was "laughable" to call the anti-tank weapons he understood to have been used by Hezbollah modern.

	...The defence minister also reiterated Russia's view on Iran's uranium enrichment programme. He said that any talk of sanctions was premature and not worthwhile. 


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/world/2017/06/05/russia-boosts-trade-north-korea-china-cuts/102389824/
	As China pulls trade from North Korea, Russia gets cozy with Kim Jong Un


http://www.businessinsider.com/r-from-russia-with-fuel-north-korean-ships-may-be-undermining-sanctions-2017-9
	Russia is reportedly going around sanctions and supplying North Korea with fuel

&nbsp;


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/chinas-spy-network-united-states-includes-25000-intelligence-officers/
	China’s Intelligence Networks in United States Include 25,000 Spies
	BY: Bill Gertz

	..."So in a fight between rogues and a gentleman, the rogues will always win," he said, "because the gentlemen fight a civilized war. The rogues do not fight a civilized war."

	...In Hong Kong, the MSS dispatched an additional 3,000 intelligence officers to the former British colony after the May 2013 incident involving former NSA contractor Edward Snowden, who fled to Hong Kong after stealing some 1.7 million secret agency documents.


&nbsp;


http://www.abc.net.au/radio/programs/am/snowden-flees-to-russia-avoiding-extradition/4775048
	Snowden flees to Russia, avoiding extradition


&nbsp;


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/chinas-spy-network-united-states-includes-25000-intelligence-officers/
	China’s Intelligence Networks in United States Include 25,000 Spies
	BY: Bill Gertz

	...Guo said Americans need to understand that China is not ruled by a normal government.

	"You should look at it as a mafia-like organization," he said.

	..."If this relationship is not managed well, I think the whole of humanity will confront major problems," he said. "The current approach adopted by the American ruling elite is tantamount to suicide."

	Guo warned of the dangers of a world dominated by the current anti-democratic Chinese system.

	"If we do not have the United States exercising some kind of control over the world system, the world will turn into a place where men eat men," he said.


&nbsp;


http://www.atimes.com/article/cia-analyst-beijing-poses-greater-threat-russia/
	CIA analyst: Beijing poses a greater threat than Russia
	By Bill Gertz


https://www.amazon.com/dp/B00BSESA22/ref=dp-kindle-redirect?_encoding=UTF8&btkr=1
	The China Threat: How the People's Republic Targets America
	by Bill Gertz

	The devastating terrorist attacks on the World Trade Center and the Pentagon and America's first domestic bio-terrorism mail attacks have shifted America's attention and resources to the immediate threat of international terrorism. But we shouldn't be fooled. Since the publication of the hardcover edition of The China Threat in November of 2000, one thing remains very much the same: the People's Republic of China is the most serious long-term national security challenge to the United States. In fact, after the events of September 11, the China threat should seem all the more real, for Communist China is one of the most important backers of states that support international terrorism.
	—From the new introduction by the author


https://archive.org/details/TheWorldWasGoingOurWayTheKGBAndTheBattleForTheTheThirdWorld
	...The unexpected surge of international terrorism in the early 1970s and the precedent set a few years before by the KGB’s use of Sandinista guerrillas against US targets in Central and North America 19 encouraged the Centre to consider the use of Palestinian terrorists as proxies in the Middle East and Europe...


&nbsp;


http://www.atimes.com/china-under-fire-for-not-reining-in-north-korea-gertz/
	China under fire for not reining in North Korea: Gertz
	By Bill Gertz

	...Michael Rubin, a resident scholar at the American Enterprise Institute, blames China for the growing North Korean threat.

	...“North Korea is China’s client. North Korea wouldn’t have gotten this far if China didn’t want them to.”

	...The Chinese failure to prevent a growing North Korean nuclear and missile threat 


http://articles.latimes.com/2000/sep/06/news/mn-16274
	...a rogue team of Russian missile scientists--thrown out of work after the collapse of the Soviet Union--may have moved to North Korea. And there, for profit or glory or both, they have directed the North Korean program--with the North Koreans themselves doing little more than putting the pieces together.

	The missile experts who have been gathering evidence to support this theory phrase it in much drier terms, of course.

	"It must be concluded that various Russian companies--not necessarily the Russian government--and North Korean authorities are closely cooperating in the missile programs," wrote German missile technology specialist Robert H. Schmucker in a recent paper.

	"From these [Russian] institutions, North Korea received everything necessary to manufacture or assemble missiles. . . . The future of North Korea's work and success depends completely on the Russian involvement."

	Timothy McCarthy, senior analyst at the Monterey Institute of International Studies, says he has been quietly examining for months the possibility that some Russians are continuing to provide key components for the North Korean missiles.

	There is no evidence to suggest that the Russian government has been involved.


http://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/worldnews/asia/northkorea/1523468/Russia-secretly-offered-North-Korea-nuclear-technology.html
	Russia secretly offered North Korea nuclear technology

	Russia is facing criticism after secretly offering to sell North Korea technology that could help the rogue state to protect its nuclear stockpiles and safeguard weapons secrets from international scrutiny.

	Russian officials touted the equipment at an IT exhibition in Pyongyang a fortnight ago - just days before the Communist state caused international alarm by launching a salvo of short and long-range missiles into the Sea of Japan.


https://spectator.sme.sk/c/20654382/foreign-rocket-engines-for-north-korea-why.html
	In early August 2017, German rocket scientist Robert Schmucker published in the Deutsche Welle his opinion that North Korea´s ballistic missiles program can only exist due to transfers of Russian and Soviet rocket engines and components. Schmucker stopped short of accusing Moscow of providing Pyongyang with technology intentionally. Five days later, the New York Times published an article linking North Korea missiles to Ukrainian rocket engines.


http://www.dw.com/en/where-did-north-korea-get-its-missile-technology/a-40107204
	Observers in Kyiv believe that the Times article may be part of a targeted campaign by Russia. In an analysis published on Tuesday, the Center for Army, Conversion and Disarmament Studies (CACDS) in Kyiv wrote that the US publication shows "signs of an information attack on Ukraine." Among other things, the aim of the article is apparently to divert attention from "their own missile technology shipments to North Korea" and to discredit Ukraine, especially in the eyes of the US.

	"Russia shares a border with North Korea, so one can deliver anything, even entire engines," said Mykhailo Samus, the CACDS deputy director for international affairs. Ukraine, on the other hand, would have logistical problems, he said.

	TUM's Robert Schmucker said that the latest story is about more than just the engines. "What about the missiles? The information itself is of no use; you need production facilities, technical equipment and above all, good quality control," he said. "A lot more must have come from Ukraine than just a few engines."


http://articles.latimes.com/2000/sep/06/news/mn-16274
	...debate has broken out among missile experts about the degree of Russian involvement in producing North Korea's missiles.

	Virtually everyone agrees that, at a minimum, the North Korean program began in the 1980s with Russian help, and that the North Korean missiles are based upon Russian designs.

	...It's also undisputed that in October 1992, Russian security officials detained more than 60 Russian missile specialists at Moscow's Sheremetyevo airport as they were about to leave for North Korea.

	...Some experts believe the Russian help for the North Korean missiles stopped in the early 1990s. "The paper trail ended eight years ago," says Pike.

	But others believe the Russian work has continued right up to today. They point to the Russian-style design of the North Korean missiles and to the fact that they were developed more rapidly, and with fewer flight tests, than those of other nations.

	...There also have also been some remarkable customs seizures in Europe of missile parts that North Korea was exporting, these experts say. The parts appear to be Russian. "The components bear Cyrillic markings on them," McCarthy says.


&nbsp;


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/fired-nsc-aide-reveals-political-warfare-operation-targeting-trump/
	Fired NSC Aide Reveals Political Warfare Operation Targeting Trump
	Higgins memo warns of Marxist, Deep State subversion

	BY: Bill Gertz

	..."This is not politics as usual but rather political warfare at an unprecedented level that is openly engaged in the direct targeting of a seated president through manipulation of the news cycle," he said.

	...Higgins's firing, along with that of two other NSC conservatives, Derek Harvey and Ezra Cohen-Watnick, has set off political infighting and charges from conservatives that National Security Adviser Lt. Gen. H.R. McMaster is opposing Trump's populist policies in favor of maintaining the policies of the former Obama administration.

	Harvey, a retired Army colonel, recently complained to McMaster about the large number of officials who were kept on at the NSC from the Obama administration. He was told by McMaster that he has a "leadership problem," according to people close to the matter.

	Cohen-Watnick was senior director for intelligence programs at the NSC and ran afoul of McMaster because of his conservative views.

	A White House official said McMaster appears to be trying to clear out anyone from the NSC staff who is outspokenly pro-Trump and has been slow-rolling the president's directives that he disagrees with.


https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2017/aug/05/donald-trump-hr-mcmaster-israel-breitbart
	Twitter accounts linked to Russian propaganda operations were also pushing a #FireMcMaster slogan, and at one point it was the top hashtag among 600 pro-Kremlin accounts


&nbsp;


http://www.washingtontimes.com/news/2010/dec/1/inside-the-ring-843880610/
	Inside the Ring: Counterspies hunt Russian mole inside National Security Agency
	By Bill Gertz 

	...One sign that the probe is fairly advanced is that FBI counterintelligence agents are involved in the search.

	“They are looking for one or more Russian spies that NSA is convinced reside at Fort Meade and possibly other DoD intel offices, like DIA [Defense Intelligence Agency],” the former official said. “NSA is convinced that at least one is at NSA.”

	Some of the 10 illegals who were posing as U.S. citizens helped service Russian agents working inside the U.S. intelligence community, the former official said.

	No other details of the investigation could be learned.


https://www.csmonitor.com/1995/0616/16204.html
	 Psst! Have a White House Secret 

	...In recent months, Bill Gertz of the conservative Washington Times has had an amazing run of stories quoting secret documents and meetings, all embarrassing to the administration. A secret memo from Robert Bell, a national security aide, indicated the talks with the Russians before the May summit were stalled.

	A secret memo from Ashton Carter, a Pentagon official, talked of offering the Russians technology as bait for an agreement. Conversations were quoted between John Deutch, then deputy secretary of defense, and his Russian counterpart.

	One can understand that a president can find it disconcerting when secret deliberations and bargaining positions are laid bare. So along came a May 2 memo, signed by Mr. Clinton, to cabinet members and heads of security agencies, ordering them to take "necessary measures to protect classified information and to refer leaks to the Justice Department for criminal prosecution."


http://articles.latimes.com/2008/jul/25/local/me-mak25
	Citing a journalist's need to keep news sources confidential, a federal judge in Santa Ana declined Thursday to order a reporter to reveal the names of federal officials who leaked information to him for a 2006 story about a grand jury investigation into a scheme to send sensitive military technology to China.

	Washington Times reporter Bill Gertz was subpoenaed to testify in federal court by U.S. District Judge Cormac Carney.

	...Gertz, who reports on national security issues, had filed a brief before Thursday's hearing saying that he would be unwilling to disclose his sources. 


&nbsp;


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/u-s-vulnerable-to-bio-warfare-attack/
	U.S. Vulnerable to Bio Warfare Attack

	BY: Bill Gertz

	...Four bioweapons experts told the House Armed Services subcommittee on emerging threats that terrorists could easily manufacture bacterial weapons like tularemia, an infectious disease that U.S. bioweapons tests in the 1960s revealed capable of producing deaths in the tens of thousands through weaponized infectious diseases.

	Rogue states like North Korea and Syria also are suspected of having germ weapons and stockpiles, the experts said.

	..."Tularemia is widely disseminated in nature and easily obtained. SEB causes rapid incapacitation and is also lethal in high concentrations."

	Both agents and the means to deliver them were manufactured by the U.S. military and stockpiled, he said. The arms would be used in combination: one for rapid effect and the other for lethality.

	...On Russia the report was categorical in stating, "Russian entities remained engaged … in BW-relevant activities."

	...Bruce Bennett, senior defense analysts with the RAND Corp., said North Korea has a major biological weapons program that included anthrax, cholera, smallpox, and plague, the latter two being infectious diseases.

	"North Korean special forces are a likely means of delivering biological weapons," Bennett said. "The North has some 200,000 special forces, some of whom could deliver devastating biological attacks against South Korea, Japan, and even the United States."

	Depending on wind, weather, and population density, "these forces could infect perhaps 50,000 people per kilogram of anthrax used," he said.

	..."There are very real and very significant dangers in the world, and the foremost target is America and Americans.


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/russia-says-u-s-expanding-bioweapons-labs-in-europe/
	Russia Says U.S. Expanding Bioweapons Labs in Europe
	BY: Bill Gertz

	..."Today, Putin has underwritten into law these and other similar threat evaluations," he stated in a report published by the Jamestown Foundation. "Russian countermeasures are surely forthcoming."

	The strategy "correctly reflects the overall Kremlin notion of Russia being besieged on all sides by the U.S. and its proxies, which purportedly seek to isolate, subvert, and cause internal political and social upheaval to bring about regime change in other countries," Felgenhauer stated.

	"In turn, Putin’s Russia is ready to defy and push back on all fronts — in Syria, in Ukraine, in the Arctic — and by all means available."

&nbsp;


http://www3.nccu.edu.tw/~lorenzo/Hao%20Chinas%20Decision.pdf
	Conclusion

	China's decision to enter the Korean War was made in a risky and uncertain situation with a very complicated historical background.


&nbsp;


https://www.wilsoncenter.org/sites/default/files/ACFAEF.pdf
	...when on the following day the Chinese decided to send their troops after all, prompting Stalin to revoke his evacuation order, he placed sharp limitations on Soviet military assistance to China in order to minimize the risk of provoking a direct conflict with the United States. He sent to China only four skeleton divisions of fighter planes and two of ground attack aircraft,43 along with 16 training aircraft, 10 tank regiments, supply and service units, and ammunition. Soviet airplanes and tanks were to be used, moreover, only to train Chinese troops; Stalin categorically forbade their use at the front. The Soviet personnel who operated these crafts were to remain in China for the shortest time possible, returning to the USSR as soon as the training course was completed. While in China, Soviet military personnel were ordered to wear Chinese uniforms and Soviet airplanes and tanks were to be similarly camouflaged.44 By November 1 Stalin amended his orders to allow Soviet fighter planes to cover Chinese bases near the border and protect the bridges over the Yalu River, but he forbade them to pursue American planes over enemy-held territory for fear that a downed Soviet pilot could be taken prisoner and thus expose the Soviet presence in the war.


	...Failing to grasp the relationship between Washington and Seoul, he exaggerated the threat of a US-sponsored invasion of North Korea. He also failed to foresee that a World War II-style invasion of South Korea would generate widespread fear that the Soviet Union was embarking on the same kind of piecemeal aggression that had led to the recent global cataclysm. This failure led to the very intervention Stalin was attempting to avoid, and greatly strengthened the ties between the United States and its allies that he hoped to weaken. Perhaps most importantly, Stalin’s assessment of the danger that the United States might intervene in Korea, or that it might expand the war beyond the peninsula once it did intervene, reveal that he interpreted US restraint in China and Korea as a weakness to be exploited rather than as a reassurance that could profitably be reciprocated. Nothing, it seems, could reassure the pathologically suspicious dictator; he could only be deterred.	 
